<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88805-0030 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-05-88.f2.A1029</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 151 / Friday, August 5, 1988 /Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Commodity Credit Corporation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Parts 704, 795, 1497, and 1498 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Payment Limitation and Determination of Eligibility of Foreign Individualsor Entities To Receive Program Benefits </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) and Agricultural Stabilizationand Conservation Service (ASCS), USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The purpose of this final rule is to adopt as final,with certain changes, the proposed rule published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on April 6, 1988 (53 FR 11474). This final rulesets forth at 7 CFR Part 1497 the regulations which will be used in limitingthe making of specified payments which are made in accordance with: (1)Price support and production adjustment programs for the 1989 and 1990crops; and (2) Conservation Reserve Program contracts executed after December22, 1987. This final rule also sets forth at 7 CFR Part 1498 the regulationswhich will be applied in determining whether a foreign individual or entityis eligible to receive certain payments, loans, and benefits. These regulationsare issued as required by amendments to the Food Security Act of 1985 whichwere made by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 and will bringpayment limitation rules into conformity with Subtitle C of the AgriculturalReconciliation Act of 1987. Conforming amendments are also made to 7 CFRParts 704 and 795.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Effective on August 1, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>H.E. Maynard, Director, Cotton,Grain, and Rice Price Support Division, ASCS, USDA, P.O. Box 2415, Washington,DC 20013. 202-447-7641.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>This final rule has been reviewed underUSDA procedures implementing Executive Order 12291 and Departmental Regulation1512-1 and has been classified ``not major.'' It has been determined thatthis rule will not result in: (1) An annual effect on the economy of $100million or more; (2) a major increase in costs or prices for consumers,individual industries, Federal, State or local governments, or geographicregions; or (3) significant adverse effects on competition, employment,investment, productivity, innovation, or the ability of United States-basedenterprises to compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or exportmarkets. The titles and numbers of the Federal assistance programs to which thisfinal rule applies are: Commodity Loan and Purchases_10.051; Cotton ProductionStabilization_10.052; Feed Grain Production Stabilization_10.055; WheatProduction Stabilization_10.058; Rice Production Stabilization_10.065;and Conservation Reserve Program_10.069 as found in the Catalog of FederalDomestic Assistance. It has been determined by an environmental evaluation that this actionwill have no significant impact on the quality of the human environment.Therefore, neither an environmental assessment nor an Environmental ImpactStatement is needed. This program/activity is not subject to the provisions of Executive Order12372 which requires intergovernmental consultation with State and localofficials. See the Notice related to 7 CFR Part 3015, Subpart V, publishedat 48 FR 29115 (June 24, 1983).<ITAG tagnum="84">Statutory Background </ITAG>Maximum payment limitations for commodity programs were first mandatedby section 101 of the Agricultural Act of 1970. This Act provided for suchrestrictions with respect to the 1971 through 1973 crops of wheat, feedgrains, and upland cotton. Subsequent legislation expanded the applicationof similar restrictions to subsequent crops of these commodities as wellas rice and extra long staple cotton. The most recent payment limitationprovisions were authorized by Section 1001 of the Food Security Act of1985 (the ``1985 Act''). The Agricultural Reconciliation Act of 1987 (the ``1987 Act''), as includedin the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987, Pub. L. 99-203, amendedthe 1985 Act with respect to the application of maximum payment limitationrestrictions to certain agricultural price support, production adjustmentand conservation programs. The amendments made by the 1987 Act are effectivefor the 1989 and 1990 crops of wheat, feed grain, rice, upland and extralong staple cotton, honey, and any other commodity for which a price supportloan program is established under the Agricultural Act of 1949, as amended(the ``1949 Act''), which allows a producer to repay such a loan at lessthan the original loan level. The amendments are applicable to any conservationreserve program contract entered into on or after December 22, 1987 butare not applicable to such contracts entered into before that date. Section 1001(1) of the 1985 Act provides that, with respect to each ofthe 1987 through 1990 crops, the total amount of deficiency payments (excludingany payment which is the result of any reduction in the price support ratefor wheat or feed grains under section 107D(c)(1) or 105C(c)(1) of the1949 Act, respectively, i.e., a ``Findley payment'') and land diversionpayments that a person may receive under one or more of the annual programsestablished under the 1949 Act for wheat, feed grains, upland cotton, extralong staple cotton, and rice may not exceed $50,000. Section 1001(2) of the 1985 Act provides that for each of the 1987 through1990 crops the total amount of the following payments that a person mayreceive under one or more of the annual programs established under the1949 Act for wheat, feed grains, upland cotton, extra long staple cotton,rice, honey and any other commodity with respect to which producers mayrepay a loan at less than the original loan level may not exceed $250,000:(1) Deficiency payments; (2) diversion payments; (3) any part of any paymentthat is determined by the Secretary to represent compensation for resourceadjustment (excluding land diversion payments) or public access for recreation;(4) disaster payments; (5) any gain realized by a producer from repayinga price support loan at less than the original loan level; (6) Findleypayments; (7) loan deficiency payments; and (8) inventory reduction payments.As originally enacted, the 1985 Act required the Secretary to issue regulationsdefining the term ``person'' and to provide for such rules as the Secretarydetermines necessary to assure a fair and reasonable application of themaximum payment limitations of the 1985 Act. However, the 1987 Act madesignificant amendments to the 1985 Act by: (1) Specifying the requirementsthat must be met by participants in various agricultural programs in orderfor such participants to be considered to be a person who is eligible toreceive the above specified program payments; (2) generally limiting theamount of benefits which a farming operation may receive if an individualor entity who is a program participant has an interest in two or more entitieswhich are engaged in farming operations; (3) providing that foreign individualsand entities would be ineligible to receive specified agricultural programpayments, loans, and benefits unless such individuals, or the individualswho own the entity, provide a substantial amount of personal labor in theproduction of crops on the farm owned or operated by the individual orentity. Accordingly, this final rule sets forth at 7 CFR Part 1497 the regulationswhich define the term ``person'' for purposes of applying the maximum paymentlimitation provisions of the 1985 Act. This final rule also sets forthat 7 CFR Part 1498 the regulations which would be applicable in determiningwhether foreign individuals or entities are eligible to receive specifiedprogram payments, loans, and benefits. As discussed below, the provisions of the final rule will not be applicableto the Agricultural Conservation Program; the Emergency Conservation Program;the Forestry Incentive Program; the Rural Clean Water Program; or the ColoradoRiver Salinity Control Program. <ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments and Changes </ITAG>In response to the proposed rule issued on April 6, 1988, 365 timely filedletters containing 893 comments were received. Respondents included thefollowing: 133 individuals, 24 corporations, 22 commodity groups and similarorganizations, 3 state agencies, 4 colleges and universities, 3 CertifiedPublic Accountants, 12 ASCS employees, 7 attorneys, 6 financial institutions,2 cooperatives, 4 foreign embassies, 2 foreign individuals, 5 farm managementcompanies, 8 general farm organizations, 2 foreign representatives, 1 representativeof an Indian tribal venture, 1 Indian tribal venture, 4 limited partnerships,2 Members of Congress, and 8 general partnerships. Some respondents sentmore than one letter. Comments were received from persons in all States,except Michigan, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Pennsylvania,Rhode Island, Vermont, West Virginia, Alaska, Wyoming, Alabama, Florida,Kentucky, Puerto Rico, Hawaii, Nevada, Oklahoma, and Utah. Fourteen comments were received which did not directly relate to the substanceof the proposed rule or that made suggestions regarding editorial and grammaticalcorrections. Numerous minor editorial changes have been made in the textof the regulations for clarity and to facilitate the application of theregulations. The discussion that follows is organized in the same sequence as the finalrule.Section 1497.1 Applicability. Comments were received from 87 respondents on this section of the proposedrule. The comments ranged from a statement that there should not be anylimitation on payments to a statement that there should not be any payments.Other commentators felt that only bona fide farmers should receive payments.Several respondents stated that shareholders in a corporation should beeligible to receive payments just like members of a partnership. Some commentsstated that payments should never go to corporations, and others that acorporation should never get more than $50,000. One commentator felt thatonly entities fully owned by family farmers should be eligible to receivepayments. Twenty-seven respondents stated that they felt that payment limitationswere very unfair and that payment limitations put a burden on large efficientfarmers. One respondent stated that the payment limitation program hasbeen abused and that it may be legally correct but it is morally wrongand goes against the original intent of the production adjustment programs.Several respondents stated that all payments should be targeted to producerson small and medium sized family farms or to those producers on farms thatare financially stressed. Several commentators stated that the paymentlimitation program should be kept in place and strongly enforced. Anotherrespondent felt that in many cases the payment limitation rules have forcedlandowners to cash rent rather than share rent land, which has increasedthe risk for the producers who are renting land. Some respondents feltthat the limits were too high, others that they were too low. One commentatorstated that payment limitation provisions go against American principles.Another commentator felt limitation levels should be raised as other governmentoutlays are raised. Nine respondents stated that they felt the USDA shouldmove away from making direct payments to farmers and let farmers receivetheir income solely from the marketplace. One commentator felt that ifpayments were limited to one payment per social security number that thesystem would be easily implemented. Another commentator requested moreexamples of the manner in which the regulations would be implemented shouldbe set forth in the final rule. In order to clarify the manner in which these regulations will be implemented,more examples have been provided in the publication of the final rule.Comments received on this section of the proposed rule were primarily ofa philosophical nature in which many respondents expressed their feelingsregarding legal issues surrounding payment limitations. Since the 1985Act specifically states which producers are eligible to receive paymentsand the manner in which payment limitation provisions will be administered,there is no authority for the Secretary to implement these general philosophicalchanges. Based upon a review of the programs which, as provided in theproposed rule, would have been subject to these regulations, it has beendetermined for some programs the implementation of payment limitation provisionscan be more easily and fairly administered separate from the payment limitationprovisions of 7 CFR Part 1497. Accordingly, the final rule adopts the proposedrule for this andSection; 1497.1 except that the programs listed at andSection;1497.1(a)(4) through andSection; 1497.1(a)(8) are excluded from this finalrule and all references to these programs have been deleted. The programsdeleted are the Agricultural Conservation Program, the Emergency ConservationProgram, the Forestry Incentive Program, the Rural Clean Water Program,and the Colorado River Salinity Control Program. Payment limitations whichare applicable to these programs will continue to be determined in accordancewith the provisions of 7 CFR Part 795.  Section 1497.2 Administration. A total of 29 comments were received on this section. Comments receivedon this section of the proposed rule dealt with a number of general issues,including the concern that the requirements of the proposed rule wouldconstitute an invasion of a producer's privacy and that, in order to administerthe rules as proposed, the Department would need to hire a substantialnumber of additional employees. Other commentators felt that Departmentemployees should be allowed to give producers advice on how best to meetthe requirements of the proposed rule. Still other respondents stated thatthe Department should not require legal documentation to support a producer'sstatus as a ``person.'' One respondent stated that the Department shouldvery specifically define the nature and extent of records producers willbe required to maintain to meet the requirements of the proposed rule.Another commentator stated that the Department will need to have an earlycommodity program sign-up in order to complete all determinations for the1989 program year. One commentator felt determinations made by county ASCcommittees should not be subject to reversal by a higher authority, exceptin the case of fraud or deception. Another commentator felt that to requireall producers to provide information on their operations was unnecessary.ASCS employees are instructed to provide all information necessary to enablea producer to make an informed decision on how the rules regarding paymentlimitations will affect the producer's farming operation. In order to ensurethat only the producer makes the decisions which affect the producer'sfarming operation, ASCS employees are not instructed to provide specificadvice to a producer on exactly how to structure an individual producer'sfarming operation. A concerted effort has been made in both the proposedand the final rule to adequately define the information that producerswill need to support their ``person'' determinations. It is the intentionof CCC and ASCS that ASCS employees begin making determinations that willhave to be done for the 1989 program year as soon as this rule becomeseffective. The regulations at 7 CFR Part 780 set forth an administrativeappeal procedure which has worked well for many years and which providesproducers a fair method of settling disputes concerning the administrationof CCC and ASCS programs. ASCS has also provided that if a county or StateASCS official has made an erroneous determination, a higher reviewing authoritymay correct the error in order to ensure that programs are administeredin an equitable and legal manner. However, equitable relief may be grantedto a producer if the producer has taken action because of the incorrectdetermination. As amended by the 1987 Act, the 1985 Act provides that onlyproducers who are ``actively engaged in farming'' are eligible to receivecertain payments. Because of this requirement, it is necessary that sufficientinformation be obtained from all producers in order to make this statutorilyrequired determination. In order to clarify the authority of the countyASC committee to request this information, the final rule provides in anew paragraph at andSection; 1497.2(g) that producers are required to providedocumentation to the applicable county ASC committee which will enablesuch committee to make the necessary determinations.In the final rule, two new paragraphs, andSection; 1497.2 (e) and (f), havebeen added in order to facilitate determinations which are made with respectto producers who become incapacitated during the crop year and with respectto estates. The basis for these amendments is set forth in the discussionof comments on andSection;andSection; 1497.4, 1497.12, and 1497.27. Section 1497.3 Definitions. A total of 267 comments were received concerning the definitions providedin this part. The comments are addressed as they relate to each individualdefinition. <T3>Active personal labor. </T3>Seventeen comments were received with respectto this definition. Several of the comments stated that the definitionwas not realistic in that it is a good business practice to hire professionallabor and that doing so should be considered active personal labor. Othercommentators felt that the regulation should provide more guidelines onthe kinds of activities which constitute active personal labor. Anothercommentator stated that the regulation should not be specific and thatthe Department's county and State ASCS employees should be left to determinewhat constitutes active personal labor. Another respondent felt that thedefinition in the proposed rule should be retained in the final rule. Section 1001A of the 1985 Act provides an individual must provide ``personallabor or active personal management'' in order to be considered to be a``person'' who is eligible to receive certain payments and with respectto the application of the statutory maximum payment limitation provisions.Accordingly, through the use of the word ``personal,'' hired labor maynot be used to meet this requirement. In order to insure uniform applicationof this provision, it is important that sufficient guidelines be maintainedwith respect to what constitutes active personal labor. Accordingly, thisdefinition has been expanded in the final rule. The proposed rule onlyincluded activities normally associated with crop production and the definitionhas been amended in the final rule to set forth activities involving livestockoperations and conservation operations which will also meet the definition.For clarification purposes, the definition has been changed to indicatethat the items listed are not inclusive but rather are indicative of thetype of activities that are considered to be active personal labor. <T3>Active personal management. </T3>Twenty-two comments were receivedon this definition. Most of these comments expressed concerns relatingto what exactly constitutes ``active personal management.'' Some commentsquestioned what the phrase ``any service reasonably necessary to conductthe farming operation'' meant as it was used in item (2)(vi) of the definition.Some commentators felt that it was going to be very difficult to determinewhere labor stopped and management began. Other commentators felt thatpersonally hiring management should meet the definition of active personalmanagement. Comments were received which expressed a need to expand thedefinition to include activities related to promotion and marketing, thehiring and firing of personnel, and providing knowledgeable technical adviceto a farming operation. Two commentators felt that the definition shouldbe retained as written. The 1987 Act amendments provided that if a person is providing managementactivities in a farming operation that such activities must constituteactive ``personal'' management in order for an individual to become activelyengaged in farming and therefore, this precludes the inclusion of hiredmanagement in this definition. The proposed rule recognized that activitieswhich constituted ``management'' would be difficult to determine and, therefore,the proposed rule attempted to provide for the making of a subjective decisionregarding this issue by including the provisions set forth in item (2)(vi).This provision provided that county and State ASC Committees would analyzeeach individual producer's farming operation to determine what the producerwas doing to manage the farming operation. The decision on hiring and firingof personnel is an important management decision and it has been determinedthat this factor will be included in item (2)(ii) of the final rule. Thisdefinition also has been changed in the final rule by expanding the activitieswhich meet the definition of ``active personal management'' to includeactivities regarding the management of conservation acres, the marketingand promotion of agricultural commodities and the acquiring of technicalinformation used in the farming operation. For clarification purposes,the definition has been changed to provide that the items listed are notinclusive but rather are indicative of the type of activities that areconsidered active personal management.<T3>Capital. </T3>Three comments were received regarding the definitionof ``capital.'' Comments received expressed a desire to include the valueof any labor or management which is contributed to the farming operationin the definition. One commentator suggested that the definition was unclear.One commentator requested a definition of the term ``related entity'' asit is used in item (3) of the definition. The commentators also expressedconcern regarding the restrictions on who could provide financing for thenecessary capital. These commentators stated that having all members ofa joint operation as signatories to a financing arrangement should notresult in all members of the joint operation being considered to be one``person'' because most lenders require all members of a joint operationto sign the financing agreement. It has been determined that contributed labor or management should notbe included as capitai since it is not an out of pocket expense of thefarming operation. Accordingly, this provision of the definition of capitalhas not been changed. It was not the intent of the proposed rule to considerseveral individuals to be one ``person'' solely on the basis that all membersof a joint operation have signed the financing agreement. Rather, the proposedrule contemplates that the contribution of capital, land, or equipmentwhich each member is using to meet the requirements of a significant contributioncannot be financed by another member of the joint operation or the jointoperation itself. Accordingly, this definition has been changed in thefinal rule to provide that capital which is used to meet the significantcontribution provision cannot be financed by the farming operation or anyindividual or entity that has an interest in the farming operation. Thefinal rule also provides that after an individual or entity has made asignificant contribution of capital, land, or equipment if a contributionof capital is used to make the individual's or entity's contribution commensuratewith its claimed share of the operation and such contribution is financedby the farming operation or any individual or entity that has an interestin the farming operation such financing must bear the prevailing interestrate. For clarity, the definition of a ``related entity'' has been addedto the final rule at andSection; 1497.3. <T3>Entity. </T3>Three comments were received regarding the definitionof ``entity.'' One commentator wanted to know how an association was tobecome actively engaged in farming. Another commentator felt that the definitionshould include farm families and one expressed the view that this definitionwas very close to the same as the definition of ``person.'' Under the proposed rule, an entity is any farming operation other thanone conducted by an individual. Accordingly, there is nothing to preventa farm family from organizing their farming operation as an entity. Anassociation is treated the same as a corporation or limited partnershipand the final rule has been amended at andSection; 1497.9 to include othersimilar entities under that section. <T3>Equipment. </T3>Two comments were received that expressed a desireto expand the definition of equipment to include owned and leased equipmentand ``rolling stock'' such as trucks and cars. There is no limitation onwhether the equipment which is contributed is owned or leased. Therefore,the proposed rule has been changed to clarify that the list of machineryin the definition of equipment is not inclusive and to expand the listto include machinery needed in livestock and conservation operations. However,mere ownership of an automobile or similar vehicle would not constituteequipment since such an asset is not necessary to the production of anagricultural commodity. The final rule also provides that equipment whichis used to meet the significant contribution provision cannot be financedby the farming operation or any individual or entity that has an interestin the farming operation. The final rule also provides that after an individualor entity has made a significant contribution of capital, land, or equipmentif a contribution of equipment is used to make the individual's or entity'scontribution commensurate with its claimed share of the operation and suchcontribution is financed by the farming operation or any individual orentity that has an interest in the farming operation such financing mustbear the prevailing interest rate. <T3>Farming operation. </T3>For purposes of clarity the proposed rule hasbeen changed to provide that a farming operation is a business enterpriseengaged in the production of agricultural products.  <T3>Financing. </T3>Twenty comments were received with respect to ``financing.''Several comments expressed concern that the proposed rule was putting toomany restrictions in place regarding family members and financing, andmembers of a joint operation and financing. Commentators also stated thatthe Department should only be concerned with crop financing related toprogram crops and not with financing of the entire farming operation. Severalother comments were received on the proposed rule which expressed concernthat the phrase ``the provision of service or goods to such operation atless than the fair market value'' was inserted to cause persons to be combinedif there was a casual exchange of equipment between neighbors. Other commentatorsstated that the Department should put more restrictions on passive investorsand less on new, young farmers. Several commentators stated that the term``financing'' was not used in the proposed rule except in the definitionand, therefore, should not be included in the final rule. Financing isused in the proposed rule with respect to the definitions of capital, land,and equipment which are set forth at andSection; 1497.3. In effect, the proposedrule provides that the capital, land, or equipment which an individualcontributes to meet the significant contribution requirements may not befinanced by the farming operation or any individual or entity that hasan interest in that farming operation. Such assets may be financed by anindividual or entity that does not have any interest in that farming operation.In addition, it was the intent of the proposed rule that if an individualor entity made a contribution of capital, land, or equipment to a farmingoperation which was not being used to meet the significant contributionrequirements, such contributions could be financed by anyone, includingan individual or entity with an interest in the farming operation if itwas financed at the prevailing interest rate. However, any contributionof capital, land, or equipment which an individual or entity made in orderto meet the requirements of these provisions must not be financed by anothermember of the farming operation, the farming operation, or any relatedentity. With respect to the family member provision provided for at andSection; 1497.14,there is no requirement for an adult family member to make a contributionof capital, land, or equipment in order to be considered to be activelyengaged in farming. Therefore, if an adult family member does make a contributionof capital, land, or equipment, such contribution of capital'' land, orequipment may be financed by anyone, including a family member who hasan interest in the farming operation. The casual exchange of equipmentwill not be considered as financing. The 1987 Act amendments require that,in order for a person to be eligible to receive payments such person mustbe actively engaged in farming. In order to be actively engaged in farming,the producer must contribute active personal management or active personallabor. This requirement will prevent abuse of programs by passive investors.However, the proposed rule has been changed to remove the definition offinancing found at andSection; 1497.3 since the term ``financing'' is notused in the regulation. <T3>Land. </T3>Eight comments were received regarding the definition of``land.'' Comments were received which expressed the concern that land,in order to meet the definition, should not be required to have ``normalcrop acreage bases for the farming area.'' Another commentator felt thatif land produced a cash flow it should meet the definition of land. In the final rule, the definition has been changed to provide that landis farmland. In some cases, to meet certain requirements of a program,land will be required to meet certain specifications such as if the landis enrolled in a program where crop acreage bases are used. To do otherwisecould lead to the abuse of these programs by allowing producers to useland which does not offer the potential of being used for program purposesbut is added to a farming operation solely to meet the substantive changerequirements provided for at andSection; 1497.18. The final rule providesthat land which is used to meet the significant contribution provisioncannot be financed by the farming operation or any individual or entitythat has an interest in the farming operation. The final rule also providesthat after an individual or entity has made a significant contributionof capital, land, or equipment if a contribution of land is used to makethe individual's or entity's contribution commensurate with its claimedshare of the operation and such contribution is financed by the farmingoperation or any individual or entity that has an interest in the farmingoperation such financing must bear the prevailing interest rate.<T3>Person. </T3>Twenty-eight comments were received regarding the definitionof ``person.'' Commentators felt that the definition of a ``person'' shouldbe the same that is used by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS). One feltthat the IRS definition of ``person'' was ``a warm body'' and that thefinal rule should adopt that definition. Many felt that to allow a corporationto be considered to be only one ``person'' was very unfair to family farmingcorporations where there are many family members involved in the farmingoperation. Some commentators felt that no corporation or joint operationshould be defined as a ``person'' eligible to receive payments. Severalcommentators felt that any entity not owned by family members should notbe defined as a ``person'' and another commentator expressed the opinionthat ``person'' was very well defined in the proposed rule and should notbe changed in the final rule. Another commentator felt that to define aperson as a ``revocable trust together with the grantor of the trust''was not correct and was, in fact, in opposition to the language and intentof the 1987 Act. Several commentators felt that the requirement found atitem (2) of the ``person'' definition, which called for the individualor entity to be responsible for their share of the costs related to thefarming operation from a fund or account separate from any other individualor entity, was unfair and should be eliminated from the final rule. Otherssuggested that ``payment entity'' should be used instead of the term ``person.''The 1987 Act amendments specifically define a ``person'' to include: ``** * (I) an individual, including any individual participating in a farmingoperation as a partner in a general partnership, a participant in a jointventure, a grantor of a revocable trust, or a participant in a similarentity (as determined by the Secretary); (II) a corporation, joint stockcompany, association, limited partnership, charitable organization, orother similar entity (as determined by the Secretary), including any suchentity or organization participating in the farming operation as a partnerin a general partnership, a participant in a joint venture, a grantor ofa revocable trust, or as a participant in a similar entity (as determinedby the Secretary); * * *.'' A corporation is defined as a ``person'' inthe 1985 Act, as amended; therefore, a corporation cannot be eliminatedfrom the definition in the regulation. Since 1971, a revocable trust hasbeen considered to be one with the grantor because the grantor has theright to dissolve that trust at any time. The 1987 Act amendments do notprovide that a revocable trust is a ``person.'' Accordingly, the grantorof a revocable trust and the trust shall continue to be considered to beone person. It was not the intent of the proposed rule that the requirementthat a person have a separate and distinct interest in the land or cropinvolved in the farming operation be used to combine individuals of a jointoperation as one person in all instances. Accordingly, the proposed rulehas been changed to provide that a joint operation's separate and distinctinterest in the land or crop will meet the requirements of item (2) forthe members of the joint operation. <T3>Public School. </T3>Eleven comments were received which stated thatthis definition is overly restrictive and that publicly supported collegesand universities should be included in the definition of public school.One commentator felt that only land grant colleges and universities shouldbe included as public schools. The 1987 Act amendments provide that limitations on ``* * * payments toany person shall not be applicable to land owned by a public school districtor land owned by a State that is used to maintain a public school * * *.''The phrase ``public school district'' is broad enough to include publicschools at a level higher than a primary, elementary, or secondary school.Accordingly, it has been determined that the proposed rule was overly restrictivein its definition of public school and the final rule provides that thedefinition of ``public school'' found at andSection; 1497.3 will includepublicly supported colleges and universities. <T3>Sharecropper. </T3>Six comments were received on this definition. Moststated that the definition was too restrictive in requiring that a sharecropperwas an individual whose total payment for labor was to be the share ofthe crop. One respondent stated that a more normal situation involvingsharecroppers provides that the individual sharecropper also receive someminimum wage during the year which is actually a draw on the individual'sshare of the crop. A determination has been made that the proposed rule was too restrictiveand this definition has been removed from the final rule. Accordingly,the definition of sharecropper currently set forth in 7 CFR Part 719 whichis used in the administration of other program matters has been adoptedfor purposes of applying this part. <T3>Significant contribution. </T3>A total of 135 comments were receivedwith respect to this definition. Most stated that the requirement as appliedto capital, land, and equipment should be a total 30 percent requirementwhether a person contributed a combination of capital, land, or equipmentor just one of the three. Several comments on the proposed rule were receivedwhich stated that it was incorrect to require stockholders in a farm corporationto contribute their labor and/or management without compensation. The commentatorsfurther stated that, if they were not paid a wage for their labor and/ormanagement but instead were compensated through dividends, the IRS wouldimpute part of those dividends as wages and require them to pay employmenttaxes. Many comments were received expressing concern with the requiredhour contributions of labor and management which must be made by a person.Some felt the 1000 hour option was too much and that it should be changedto 500 hours which is the amount IRS uses to determine material participationin a business enterprise. Others expressed that this hour requirement wouldbe an extreme hardship on both producers and ASCS employees administeringthe program because producers do not keep those kind of records. Commentatorsalso expressed the view that since it is very difficult to determine managementwhich is reasonable and necessary and no two farming operations were alike,a situation would develop where a determination of management which wasreasonable and necessary on one farming operation would not be reasonableand necessary on another. Several commentators stated that the regulationsshould not try to be very specific but rather should leave those decisionsto locally elected county ASC committees who are charged with administeringthe program. Several commentators felt that the regulations should providemore guidelines. The general concern of the commentators was that, in determininga ``significant contribution'' of personal management, time was not a goodmeasure of such a contribution. They believed that the type of decisionsan individual was making about a farming operation was far more importantin determining whether a person had made a significant contribution ofmanagement than the number of hours the person took to make the decision.Other commentators stated that requiring 50 percent of an individual'scommensurate share was unreasonable and would prevent new farmers fromstarting to farm. Another commentator stated the 50 percent requirementwas very appropriate. Some commentators stated that the producers shouldbe allowed to simply certify the quantity of their inputs and not requiresupporting documentation. Others felt that ongoing farming operations shouldbe able to meet the labor and management requirements based on a countyASC committee's knowledge of past performance by that producer. 7 CFR 1497.6 provides that, for any person to receive payments under anyof the applicable programs, a person must be actively engaged in farmingby making a significant contribution of required inputs. The definitionof a ``substantial contribution'' set forth in the proposed rule providedthat the contribution of one half or more of a person's share of any oneof these inputs was significant. Accordingly, the 50 percent factor isonly applied against an amount equal to the value of the capital neededin the operation or the rental value of the land or equipment contributed.If a person contributed any combination of any two or three of these assets,then a 30 percent factor is applied against an amount equal to all of thecosts of the farming operation, except for the value of the personal laborand management which is contributed. As used in the 1987 Act amendments,the term ``contributed'' implies that whatever an individual was contributingcould not be paid for by the farming operation. Accordingly, this provisionof the proposed rule is not changed. The intent of the proposed rule was that an individual or entity wouldneed to provide 50 percent or more of the individual's or entity's commensurateshare of either labor or management, never to exceed 1000 hours, in orderto qualify as actively engaged in farming. It was obvious in the commentsthat there was not a general understanding that the required contributionwas the lesser of 1000 hours or 50 percent of the person's commensurateshare and not both. 1000 hours is approximately one half of a normal workyear. On very large farming operations which require large amounts of laborand management, it could be impossible to provide 50 percent of a person'scommensurate share of the operation's labor or management if the operationis owned by a small number of persons. Because of this situation, the 1000hour maximum limitation was proposed. The proposed rule also provided thecounty ASC committee the responsibility for determining the necessary quantityof management needed for a specific farming operation since it was recognizedthat the required hours would be different on each farming operation. In order to ensure that farming operations are not adversely affected bythe regulations, a determination has been made to change the proposed ruleat andSection; 1497.9 to provide that stockholders in a farming corporationmay be compensated for the labor and management which they provide in orderfor the corporation to become actively engaged in farming. In order toprovide greater flexibility to producers, the final rule also removes therequirement that a person must provide a specified amount of hours of managementbut retains the hour requirement for labor. However, the final rule alsoprovides that in the case of active personal management, producers mustprovide information to show that they are providing management activitiesthat are critical to the overall profitability of the farming operation.In the evaluation of a person's management activities, the potential impactof the decisions made on the profitability of the farming operation inwhich the person is involved will be taken into account. The proposed rulehas also been changed to provide that a significant contribution of laboror management may include a combination of labor and management.<T3>Substantial beneficial interest. </T3>Three comments were receivedconcerning the definition of a ``substantial beneficial interest.'' Severalof the comments received on this definition expressed concern that the10 percent threshold could serve as a loophole which could lead to programabuse by individuals participating in numerous corporations with less thana 10 percent interest in each such corporation. It has been determined that adequate safeguards have been taken to ensurethat programs are not abused because of the 10 percent ownership threshold.In addition, if it is determined that a person has attempted to avoid theprovisions of Part 1497 by organizing a farming operation through a seriesof entities in which a person has less than a 10 percent ownership interest,an ownership interest of less than 10 percent shall be considered to bea significant beneficial interest. Accordingly, the proposed rule is adoptedwithout change. <T3>Total value of the farming operation. </T3>Nine comments were receivedregarding this definition. Several respondents to the proposed rule indicatedthat this definition was unclear. One comment expressed a request thatthis figure not include any harvesting or ginning expense. Other respondentsexpressed concern about using this figure to determine how much capital,land, or equipment a person must contribute because what is projected asthe total cost of a farming operation at the beginning of a year many timesdoes not turn out to be the actual cost at the end of the year. They feltthat there should be an opportunity at the end of the year to make up anyshort fall that may exist in a situation like this. The purpose of determining this value is to determine the required contributionof capital, land, or equipment which is necessary in order for a personto be considered to be actively engaged in farming. The purpose of thisprovision is not to disqualify persons from program participation. Sinceproducers are able to closely estimate what their annual costs are goingto be, this provision will not create an undue burden on producers. Accordingly,this section of the proposed rule has been adopted without change. Section 1497.4 Timing for determining status of persons. Eighteen comments were received regarding this section of the proposedrule. Several respondents felt that, if an action was taken after April1 that would increase the number of persons eligible to receive payments,such an action should be recognized since changes which decrease the numberof eligible persons are recognized. Respondents also commented that therewas a need for a provision to take into consideration situations when aperson, for reasons beyond the individual's control, is prevented fromfulfilling the farm's operating plan. One respondent expressed a desirethat the date for making this determination never be earlier than April1. To allow producers to take an action after the date on which ``person''determinations are made which would increase the number of persons wouldlead to program abuse. Accordingly, this portion of the proposed rule isadopted as the final rule. However, andSection; 1497.2 is changed to providerelief for those individuals who cannot, for reasons beyond their control,fulfill in that year their farm operation plan. Section 1497.5 Limitation on the number of entities through which an individualor entity may receive a payment and required notification. Twenty-four comments were provided on this section of the proposed rule.Respondents to this section provided comments suggesting that this provisionwould discriminate against large efficient farms and would, therefore,cause a number of reorganizations. Other respondents stated that they thoughtthe number of farming operations should not make a difference if the persondid not exeeed the payment limitation when considering all of the operations.Some commentators felt the rule was totally unfair, others felt that the15 day time limit on notifying the county ASCS office of the individual'spermitted entities was too short. Still others expressed concern that thisprovision would cause producers to not participate in the programs subjectto this part and thereby work against the purpose of the programs. Manyrespondents pointed out that the proposed rule did not provide that ASCSwould notify an entity that such entity's payments may be reduced and thengive the members of the entity a chance to adjust their interests in theentity. The 1987 Act amendments specifically provide for a limitation on the numberof entities through which an individual or entity can receive payments.The proposed rule inadvertently omitted the provision for notificationand adjustment of an entity's or individual's share in program paymentsprior to a reduction in such payments. As a result, this section of therule has been changed to provide for this provision. The proposed ruleprovided that producers had 15 days folloving the date a contract or agreementwas submitted to notify the county ASC committee of their permitted entities.A determination has been made that this provision may be too restrictivedepending upon the date upon which program provisions are announced. Accordingly,the final rule provides that the Deputy Administrator will announce thedate when this notification is due. Section 1497.6 General provisions for determining whether an individualor entity is actively engaged in farming. Forty-one comments were received regarding this section of the proposedrule. Some commentators felt that the requirement to document an individual'sor entity's active involvement would require unnecessary paperwork andwas an invasion of privacy. Some believed the rule was discriminatory againstdifferent groups including retired farmers, handicapped individuals, andabsentee partners because it requires active personal labor. Other commentatorssuggested that one family member should be able to supply active personallabor or management and qualify numerous family members as being activelyengaged in farming. Other commentators expressed their belief that farmersshould not be required to supply active personal labor or management inorder to be considered to be actively engaged in farming. Several commentatorssuggested that anyone who supplied any two of the five possible inputsshould be determined to be actively engaged in farming. One commentatorsuggested that the supplying of water for irrigation purposes should meetthe requirement of a contribution of equipment. Several commentators suggestedthat leased land and equipment which an individual or entity contributesto a farming operation should be eligible to meet the requirement for beingactively engaged in farming. The 1987 Act amendments require each individual or entity that is receivingpayments to be actively engaged in farming and also require that, in orderfor an individual to be considered to be actively engaged in farming, theindividual must provide active personal management or active personal labor.In order to meet these requirements, information must be collected fromindividual producers to determine that they are in compliance with theseprovisions. The mere provision of water is not considered to meet the requirementof providing equipment to a farming operation since it is not ``equipment.''However, if the individual or entity providing the water has the machinerynecessary to deliver the water and a determination is made that the contributionof such equipment and the labor and management actually used to deliversuch water is a significant amount, the individual or entity could be determinedto be actively engaged in farming. It was the intent of the proposed rulethat leased land and equipment could be used to meet that requirement ofproviding land or equipment to the farming operation. Accordingly, thesesuggested changes are not necessary. As discussed above, the proposed rulehas been amended to provide for a contribution of a combination of activepersonal labor and active personal management as discussed at andSection;1497.3 under the definition of ``significant contribution.'' Section 1497.8 Joint operations. Twelve comments were received concerning joint operations and how theirmembers can be considered to be actively engaged in farming. One commentatorfelt that a joint operation should not be considered to be a person forpayment limitation purposes. Another commentator suggested that the termjoint operation should be defined at andSection; 1497.3. Several commentswere received that expressed concern with requiring each partner to providepersonal labor or management in order for that partner to be consideredactively engaged. Many of these comments suggested that if this requirementcould not be deleted, relief should be provided to partnerships that werein existence prior to December 31, 1985. Many commentators stated thatthey believe the proposed rule requires that each partner make a contributionof capital, land, or equipment each year in order for that partner to beconsidered actively engaged. They also stated that this requirement, whichthe commentators believe is found at andSection; 1497.8(c), is directly contraryto the provisions of the 1985 Act.Since the 1987 Act amendments do not include a joint operation in the definitionof a ``person,'' neither did the proposed rule. The proposed rule definedjoint operation at andSection; 1497.8(a). The 1987 Act amendments specificallyprovide that, in order for members of joint operations to be consideredactively engaged, they had to make ``a significant contribution of activepersonal labor or active personal management.'' There is no statutory authoritywhich would allow one member of a joint operation to provide either activepersonal labor or active personal management on behalf of all other membersof such operation. It is the intent of the 1987 Act amendments that eachperson be actively engaged in farming each year that a person receivesa payment. This means that each year each person must make the requiredcontributions of capital, land, or equipment and labor or management. However,in the case of a joint operation, the 1987 Act amendments provide thata joint operation may make a contribution of capital, land, or equipmenton behalf of its members and this is provided for in the proposed rule.Accordingly, it has been determined that this section of the proposed rulewill be adopted without change except that the definition of ``joint operation''will be moved from this section to andSection; 1497.3. Section 1497.9 Limited partnership and corporations. Forty comments were received on this section of the proposed rule. Manycommentators said that the proposed rule was overly restrictive becausethe 1987 Act amendments only require that: ``* * * members collectivelymake a significant contribution of personal labor or active personal management* * *.'' The commentators felt that a great number of family corporationswould be adversely impacted by the requirement that those providing thelabor or management had to own more than 50 percent of the corporation.Family farm corporations in which the majority stockholder has retiredand is no longer providing labor or management is the example most oftencited. One commentator suggested that the requirement should be ``stockholderswith at least 50 percent of the stock'' rather than ``more than 50 percent.''Several commentators felt that stockholders in a corporation should eachreceive a payment in the same manner that partners in a general partnershipdo instead of making the corporation a person and limiting it to one payment.Other commentators felt that considering a stockholder that owns more than50 percent of the corporation together as one with the corporation wasnot fair and equitable. One of the major purposes of the amendments to the 1985 Act which weremade by the 1987 Act was to reduce the proliferation of new ``persons''for payment limitation purposes. To allow one individual with a minorityinterest in a corporation to provide all of the labor or management clearlyviolates the intent of the 1987 Act amendments and would encourage thecreation of more corporations simply to receive government payments. Asamended, the 1985 Act defines a person to include a corporation and notto include a partnership. With respect to corporations and shareholders,the proposed rule retains the same provisions which were used in prioryears to consider a stockholder and a corporation as one ``person'' whenthe stockholder held a majority interest in the corporation. In order toreflect this continued treatment of corporations, a determination has beenmade to change the proposed rule to provide that stockholders holding atleast 50 percent of the interest in the corporation or limited partnershipmust be providing active personal management or active personal labor ratherthan stockholders holding greater than 50 percent as the proposed ruleprovided. The proposed rule has also been changed to provide that limitedpartnerships, corporations, and other similar entities may compensate theirmembers for the labor or management which such members contribute to meetthe requirements for the entity to be actively engaged in farming. Section 1497.10 Irrevocable trusts. Several of the 21 comments received on this section of the proposed rulestated that both the trustee and the beneficiaries should be eligible toprovide active personal labor or active personal management to enable thetrust to be considered actively engaged in farming because in many casesthe beneficiaries are minors or the trust provides that the trustee shallmanage the business of the trust. One commentator expressed confusion atthe use of the term ``beneficiary'' in the proposed rule because it wasunclear whether we intended this to mean ``income beneficiary'' or ``remainderbeneficiary.'' The 1987 Act amendments require that a person must be actively engagedin farming in order to receive certain payments. In an irrevocable trust,the beneficiaries are the ultimate recipients of the payments and, therefore,should be the individuals who must be actively engaged in farming. Accordingly,this portion of the proposed rule is retained. It was the intent of theproposed rule to provide that the term beneficiary apply to an income beneficiaryand not a remainder beneficiary. Therefore, the proposed rule is changedto clarify that references to ``beneficiaries'' refers to ``income beneficiaries.''Section 1497.11 Revocable trusts. Seven respondents made comments on this section of the proposed rule. Onerespondent felt that a revocable trust and its grantors should be treatedas a general partnership and its partners. This particular comment is discussedin detail under the comments on the definition of ``person.'' Other respondent'scomments were very similar to the ones received on irrevocable trusts withrespect to allowing the trustee to provide labor and management to enablethe trust to meet the actively engaged in farming requirement. For the above discussed reasons, with just minor clarification changes,this section of the proposed rule is adopted without change. Section 1497.12 Estates. Sixteen comments were received on this section of the proposed rule. Commentswere received which stated that if the deceased would have been activelyengaged in farming that the estate should automatically be considered tobe actively engaged. Other commentators felt that because a heir and thedeceased would have been combined, there was no reason to combine suchheir with the estate. Another comment stated that the combination shouldonly last for one year. Still another commentator asked how long the combinationor separation would last. One commentator felt that estates should be treatedthe same as irrevocable trusts. Another commentator felt the estate rulesas proposed were reasonable and fair. In developing the proposed rule, every attempt was made to be fair andequitable to the heirs of an estate. Accordingly, the proposed rule assumedthat an estate would not be held open simply for the purposes of receivinga program payment because there are valid reasons, including tax consequences,which would ensure that the estate be closed timely. In determining thatthe estate should be combined with whomever the deceased would have beencombined, it was determined that such an action would provide for the fairand equitable treatment of heirs, since the same amount of payments wouldbe made as would have been made if the deceased individual had lived. Adetermination has been made to adopt the provisions of the proposed rule,except that three years after the individual dies, the estate will no longerbe considered to be actively engaged in farming unless, on a case by casebasis, the Deputy Administrator determines that the estate has not beensettled primarily for purposes of obtaining program payments. For clarificationpurposes, the proposed rule has been reorganized. Section 1497.13 Landowners. A total of 122 comments were received on this section of the proposed rule.Several commentators stated that the proposed rule, which excluded membersof partnerships as landowners when the land was deeded to the partnership,was grossly unfair. This provision was explained in example 2 of the proposedrule. Other comments received expressed a lack of assurance as to how thelandowner provision might apply in the case where the ownership interestis an undivided interest and also as to how the provision would apply forother entities, such as corporations, trusts, and estates. Still othercomments stated that simply owning land should not entitle owners to paymentsand that payments should go only to operators and not to landowners. Afew commentators stated that they were in favor of the proposed rule. It was the intent of the proposed rule that any ``person'' who owned landwould be subject to the landowner provision. This means that the provisionwill apply to corporations, irrevocable trusts, estates and all entitiesmeeting the definition of a ``person.'' Also, since in the case of ownershipin undivided interest title to the land lies with those that have the undividedinterest, those individuals would be eligible to use the provision. Inthe case of a joint operation (such as a general partnership) holding titleto the land, the individual partners would not, under the proposed rule,be eligible to use the landowner provision. This portion of the proposedrule was based on the premise that a general partnership does not meetthe definition of a ``person.'' However, in order to provide for the fairand equitable treatment of joint operations, a determination has been madeto change the proposed rule to provide that members of a joint operationthat owns land may use the landowner provision if documentation is providedwhich indicates upon dissolution of the joint operation, the title to theland owned by the joint operation will revert to the individual members.Section 1497.14 Family members. Sixteen comments were received concerning this section. Some comments indicatedthat the regulations should make it easier to bring family members intoa farming operation and make them eligible for payments. Other commentatorsfelt that farmers should not be allowed to let their offspring providea minimum amount of labor and automatically qualify for payments. Somecommentators felt there was a need to clarify that individuals or entitiesother than family members can have a part in a farming operation and stillhave family members use this provision to be considered to be activelyengaged in farming so long as a majority of the members of the operationare members of the family. A number of comments were received which agreedwith the change in the rules regarding family members. The 1987 Act amendments specifically provide for a relaxation in the financingrules as the rules are applied to family farming operations and generallyprovide for overall relaxation of payment limitation provisions in orderto provide greater flexibility to family farming operations desiring tobring additional family members into such farming operation. Accordingly,these provisions of the proposed rule are adopted without change. For clarity,the final rule provides the family member provision is applicable to afarming operation conducted by persons. Section 1497.16 Cash rent tenants. Many of the 39 comments received concerning this section stated that therequirement that equipment not be leased from the landowner was very unfair.Commentators felt this provision was overly restrictive and not requiredby the 1987 Act amendments. Several commentators suggested that, if theequipment is leased at a fair market value in an arms length transaction,the tenant should be able to lease the equipment from anyone, includingthe landowner. Another commentator felt that the prohibition on leasingthe landowner's equipment should not apply to equipment that would normallygo with the land, such as irrigation equipment. Other commentators feltproviding labor and equipment through a custom farmer should be acceptable.Still other commentators felt that the landlord and tenant should onlybe combined on the farm where the tenant had not supplied the equipmentand not on other farms where the two might be working together. Other commentatorsexpressed a concern that a contribution of equipment should not be necessaryif the tenant was providing capital and management. Because of abuses in the past, the requirement that a cash rent tenantprovide equipment along with capital and management is required by the1987 Act amendments. Some of the abuses in the past included using theowner's equipment to farm the cash rented land and leasing the equipmentat rates that were lower than the fair market value of such leasing. However,after receiving these comments, it has been determined that the proposedrule is overly restrictive. Accordingly, the final rule provides that theequipment may be leased from the landowner as long as it is leased at thefair market value. For clarification purposes, the final rule also provides that, if equipmentis leased from the same individual who is providing hired labor to thefarming operation, the contracts must be two separate contracts with termsthat reflect the fair market value of the leased equipment and hired labor.Such a tenant must also exercise complete control over the use of the leasedequipment during the crop year. Section 1497.17 Persons not considered to be actively engaged in farming.Four comments were received on this section of the proposed rule. Respondentsstated that a guaranteed crop share lease is the same as a cash lease.It was intended that such treatment be afforded guaranteed share leased.Accordingly, for clarity, this suggested change is adopted. Section 1497.18 Changes in farming operations. Twenty comments and suggestions on this section of the proposed rule werereceived. Many respondents stated that the rules as they are proposed wouldeliminate reorganizations which are done for good business reasons otherthan for meeting the requirements of this part. Other respondents feltthat any reference requiring land which is brought into a farming operationto have crop acreage bases normal for the area should be eliminated. Stillothers stated that acceptable changes for meeting this provision shouldinclude those changes already contained in current ASCS operating procedure.A few respondents felt there is a need to clarify that only farm operationsincreasing the number of persons have to meet the requirements of thisprovision. Several respondents stated that the requirements for an increasein acreage to meet this provision should be the lesser of 20 percent orthe acreage which is required to increase the program payments which willbe earned by the additional person. Respondents also stated that if a personmeets the substantive change requirement in one year, but for a differentreason the person is not determined to be actively engaged in farming,such person should not have to meet the substantive change requirementagain once they are determined to be actively engaged in farming. A fewrespondents felt that a change from share rent to cash rent should meetthis requirement. In the past, changes have been made by persons to meet the substantivechange requirement which in essence were paper changes in which the samepeople farmed the same land with the same equipment. The proposed ruleattempted to tighten some provisions where there have been abuses in thepast, such as with the dissolution of an entity, the change in ownershipof equipment or land, and a change from a share rent situation to a cashrent situation. It was the intention of the proposed rule that only farmoperations that are increasing the number of persons who would be eligibleto receive payments would have to meet this requirement. It was also intendedthat if a person meets this requirement in one year, but for a differentreason the person is not considered to be actively engaged in farming,the farming operation subsequently would not have to meet the substantivechange requirement again if such person is later determined to be activelyengaged in farming. In order to provide equitable treatment of farming operations which haveexpanded for legitimate reasons, a determination has been made to expandthe number and type of changes which meet this requirement to include thechange in ownership of land or equipment as long as the amounts of landor equipment which are changing ownership are commensurate with the sharesof the new persons being recognized in the farming operation. Accordingly,andSection; 1497.18 of the proposed rule is changed to reflect these changes.Section 1497.19 Husband and wife. Forty-three comments were received on this section of the proposed rule.Many commentators in general felt that a farm wife should be consideredas a separate person if she maintained her farming operation separate fromher husband's farming operation. Other commentators felt that the proposedrule did not go far enough in recognizing farm wives as persons. Some feltthat wives should be separate persons in all cases. Some felt that theyshould never be considered to be separate persons. The 1987 Act amendments specifically set forth the conditions where a husbandand wife can be considered to be separate persons. These conditions areset forth in the proposed rule. Accordingly, this section of the proposedru1e has been adopted without change. Section 1497.22 Indian tribal ventures. Three comments were received which stated that allowing the certificationby the Bureau of Indian Affairs or the tribal council to apply only toowned land was overly restrictive and contrary to congressional policy.The 1985 Act, as amended, provides that all persons, including Indians,are subject to these limitations. However, prior regulations have recognizedthat payments to tribal ventures can be expedited through the certificationprocedure. In order to prevent program abuse, the proposed rule providesthis exemption only to tribal owned land. However, this section of theproposed rule has been modified to clarify that Indian tribal trust landsare covered under the certification provision.Section 1497.23 States, political subdivisions, and agencies thereof. Three comments were received which expressed discontent with the proposedrule. They stated that the social and economic impact on States was notconsidered. The proposed rule reflects the intent of Congress to consider a State andall of its subdivisions to be one person. Accordingly, this portion ofthe proposed rule is not changed. Section 1497.24 Scheme or device. One of the two comments received on this section of the proposed rule suggestedthat individuals that were found guilty of a scheme or device should bebanned from the program for three years. The other respondent expressedthat the section was somewhat unclear in that andSection; 1497.24 (a) and(b) seemed to be applying two different standards. The purpose of andSection; 1497.24(a) is to continue the prior policy ofwithholding payments in the current year in the event a scheme or devicehas been employed to avoid these regulations. This paragraph provides someexamples of the type of actions which are considered to be a scheme ordevice. The language in andSection; 1497.24(b) is taken directly from the1987 Act amendments and provides the authority to determine that an individualshall be ineligible to receive payments for two years if the individualis found to have employed a scheme or device to avoid payment limitationprovisions. Accordingly, this section of the proposed rule is adopted withoutchange. Section 1497.25 Joint and several liability. Two comments were received on this section of the proposed rule. Both respondentsstated that, if one member of a combined ``person'' could be readily identifiedas the party who failed to comply with these regulations, such party shouldbe the party held liable for any refunds of excess payments. Also, in thecase of a cash rent tenant who does not provide equipment or labor, thisprovision could be used to impose liability on an individual who was alandowner who had no interest in any payments at any time. The purpose of this section is to provide authority to protect the interestof the government in the case of excess payments being made. Since allproducers who farm with other producers have voluntarily elected to engagein the benfits which are derived from such an operation, it has been determinedthat such producers should be responsible for ensuring that all requiredprogram provisions are followed by all producers on the farm. Accordingly,this section of the proposed rule is adopted without change.Section 1497.26 Equitable adjustments. Eight comments were received on this section of the proposed rule. Respondentsto this section of the proposed rule commented that the provision whichstates that ``reorganizations that do not result in an increase in payments''ensures that there is no relief available under this provision. Other respondentsfelt that relief should be available when the current payment limitationrules are applied to farms that have been in existence for ten years ormore. The purpose of this section is to provide for a transition from the regulationsat 7 CFR Part 795 to the rules at 7 CFR Part 1497. The section providesthat if an individual or entity takes action in good faith on the actionor advice of authorized employees of the Department, the Deputy Administratormay grant relief to the extent the Deputy Administrator deems necessary.It also provides that strict interpretation of the substantive change rulesfound at andSection; 1497.18 may be waived with respect to a reorganizationof a farming operation which, if not reorganized, would result in the decreaseof the number of eligible persons under the new regulations so long asthe reorganization does not increase the number of eligible persons abovethe number which would otherwise have been determined under 7 CFR Part795 prior to the reorganization. Accordingly, this section of the proposedrule is adopted without change.Section 1497.27 Appeals. Most of the 16 comments received regarding this section of the proposedrule stated that it was unfair to penalize an appellant by completely eliminatingthe time limits imposed by this section simply because the appellant requestsmore time or a postponement of the hearing. Most respondents felt thatit would be more equitable to impose the time restraints when the hearingis aetually held. Other comments stated that the 1987 Act amendments alsoprovided that a time limit should be placed on the amount of time a countyASC committee has to make an initial person determination before the appealprocess is even started. Once a hearing has been scheduled for a person, any delay or postponementwill adversely affect other producers, awaiting a hearing. Accordingly,this section of the proposed rule is adopted; however, the proposed rulehas been changed at andSection; 1497.2 to require that the county ASC committeesshall make actively engaged in farming and person determinations within60 days after the producer files the required documentation for these determinations.Part 1498_Foreign Persons Ineligible for Program Benefits The Department received 39 comments from several sources on Part 1498 ofthe proposed rule. Four of the comments were received from foreign governmentsand they were opposed to the proposed rule. All of these foreign governmentsexpressed concern that they were being discriminated against with thisrule and that it might be in violation of several international treaties.The proposed rule implements the clear Congressional intent expressed inthe 1987 Act. Accordingly, except for editorial changes for the purposeof clarification, the proposed rule found at 7 CFR Part 1498 is adoptedwithout change. Part 704_Conservation Reserve Program and Part 795_Payment Limitation Conforming amendments are also made to 7 CFR Parts 704 and 795 to makereference to new 7 CFR Parts 1497 and 1498. <ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Provisions of Final Rule </ITAG>Section 1301 of the 1987 Act amended the 1985 Act by adding a new section1001A to provide that: (1) An individual who receives specified farm programpayments may not also hold directly or indirectly substantial beneficialinterests in more than two entities, as defined in section 1001(5)(B)(i)(II)of the 1985 Act, which are engaged in farming operations that receive suchpayments; and (2) such an individual who does not receive such paymentsmay not hold directly or indirectly substantial beneficial interests inmore than three such entities as defined in section 1001(5)(B)(i)(II) ofthe 1985 Act. If an individual owns a substantial beneficial interest inexcess of the permitted number of entities, the payment which is made tothe ``excess'' entity is reduced by an amount that bears the same relationto the full payment that the individual's beneficial interest in the entitybears to all beneficial interests in the subject entity. In order for an individual or entity to be made aware of these limitations,section 1001A(a)(2) of the 1985 Act provides that an entity receiving aspecified payment must notify each individual or entity that holds a substantialbeneficial interest in such entity of these provisions. In addition, eachaffected individual must notify the Secretary of Agriculture of those entitieswhich are to be considered eligible to receive payments. Failure of theaffected person to provide the required notification will result in thereduction of payments commensurate with the individual's or entity's sharein the subject entity. Accordingly, the final rule sets forth at 7 CFR 1491.3 the definitionsof the terms ``permitted entity,'' ``person,'' and ``substantial beneficialinterest.'' A permitted entity would be an entity which is designated annuallyby an individual who is eligible to receive payments which are subjectto the payment limitation provisions of the 1985 Act. Generally, a person would be defined as an individual, corporation, jointstock company, association, limited partnership, irrevocable trust, charitableorganization or similar entity including any individual or entity participatingin a farming operation as: a partner in a general partnership; a participantin a joint venture; or a participant in a similar entity. A State, politicalsubdivision and agencies thereof would also be considered to be one person.A substantial beneficial interest would be defined as an interest which,either directly or indirectly, results in an ownership interest of 10 percentor more. A lesser amount would be applicable if it was determined thata financial arrangement had been established for the purpose of circumventingthe provisions of 7 CFR Part 1497. The notification procedure applicable to an entity receiving a paymentand those individuals and entities who have a substantial beneficial interestin such an entity is set forth at 7 CFR 1497.5. In accordance with 7 CFR1497.5, under the following example, the following notifications wouldbe required. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s30,10 </C><T4>Agricultural Incorporated </T4><H1>Stockholder </H1><H1>Ownership interest (percent)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">A Incorporated <D>33\1/3\ </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B and F Partnership <D>33\1/3\ </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Individual C <D>33\1/3\ </D></ITAG>A Incorporated: <ITAG tagnum="2">Individual A <D>50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Individual D <D>25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Individual E <D>25 </D></ITAG>B and F Partnership: <ITAG tagnum="2">Individual B <D>50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Individual F <D>50</D></ITAG></ITAG> Agricultural, Inc., consisting of A, Inc., B and F Partnership, and IndividualC, must inform the local Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation (ASC)Committee of the stockholders of Agricultural, Inc., and must inform eachstockholder of the ``permitted entity'' provision. A, Inc., consisting of Individual A, Individual D, and Individual E mustinform each stockholder of the ``permitted entity'' provision. Each stockholderand partner must then inform the local ASC committee of their selectedentities for payment. B and F Partnership, consisting of Individual B and Individual F must informeach partner of the ``permitted entity'' provision and each partner mustthen inform the local ASC committee of their selected entities for payment.If Individual E, a stockholder of A, Inc., does not choose A, Inc.'s interestin Agricultural Inc., as a ``permitted entity,'' the payments made to Agricultural,Inc., would then be reduced by Individual E's ownership interest in A,Inc. For example, if Agricultural, Inc., is eligible to receive $50,000,the 33\1/3\ interest of A, Inc., in Agricultural, Inc., would be $16,665.Individual E's 25 percent interest in the $16,665 would be $4,166. Therefore,Agricultural, Inc., would be eligible to receive $45,834. Section 1302 of the 1987 Act amended the 1985 Act by providing in section1001A(b) of the 1985 Act that in order for a person to be eligible to receivespecified payments such person must be actively engaged in farming. Inorder for an individual, including an individual who is a partner in ageneral partnership or a participant in a joint venture, to be consideredto be actively engaged in farming the individual must make a significantcontribution to the farming operation of: (1) Capital, equipment, or land,and (2) active personal labor or active personal management. With respect to limited partnerships, corporations, and similar entities,the entity must make a significant contribution of capital, equipment,or land to the farming operation and the stockholders or participants mustcollectively make a significant contribution of active personal labor oractive personal management. Special provisions are applicable to landowners, family members, and sharecroppersso long as their contributions are at risk and commensurate with the persons'share of the profits and losses from such operation. The special provisionsfor landowners do not include landlords who do not own the land which ispart of the farming operation. Such landlords must contribute active personallabor and/or active personal management to be considered to be activelyengaged in farming. Landowners who contribute owned land to a farming operationin return for a share rent of the crop produced on the farm or who retaincontrol of the land and receive all of the income from the land are consideredto be actively engaged in farming. Similarly, a sharecropper who makesa significant contribution of active personal labor to the farming operationand who receives a specified share of the crop produced on the farm inpayment for such labor is considered to be activeiy engaged in farming.Section 1001A(b)(3)(B) of the 1985 Act provides that with respect to afarming operation conducted by persons, a majority of whom are individualswho are family members, an adult family member who makes a significantcontribution of active personal management or active personal labor shallbe considered to be actively engaged in farming if such person's contributionto the farming operation is at risk and is commensurate with the person'sshare of the profits and losses from such operation. Section 1001A(b)(4) of the 1985 Act provides that a landowner who is contributingland to the farming operation will not be considered to be actively engagedin farming if the landowner receives cash rent or a crop share guaranteedto be paid as rent. This section also provides that any other person whodoes not meet the actively engaged requirements for individuals, entities,landowners, family members, or sharecroppers shall not be considered tobe actively engaged in farming. Accordingly, 7 CFR 1497.3 sets forth the following definitions which willbe used in determining whether a person is actively engaged in farming:``active personal labor;'' ``active personal management;'' ``capital;''``equipment;'' ``family member;'' and ``land.'' 7 CFR 1497.6-1497.15 setsforth the regulations which will be used to determine whether a personis actively engaged in farming. Section 1001(5)(B)(iii) of the 1985 Act provides that, with respect toany married couple, the husband and wife shall be considered to be oneperson. However, any married couple consisting of spouses who prior totheir marriage were separately engaged in unrelated farming operationsshall be treated as separate persons with respect to such operations solong as the operations remain separate. Accordingly, 7 CFR 1479.19 setsforth the regulations with respect to farming operations conducted by ahusband and wife.The regulations currently set forth at 7 CFR Part 795 with respect to minorchildren, charitable organizations, and Indian tribal ventures are generallythe same as the regulations set forth in 7 CFR Part 1497. However, 7 CFR1497.22 provides payments to Indian tribal ventures may be made in excessof the applicab1e payment limitation, only with respect to land which isowned by the tribal venture or held in trust for the tribal council, whenBIA or the tribal council certify that no individual Indian will receivemore than the applicable limitation. An estate is currently considered to be the same person as the sole heirof the estate. 7 CFR 1497.12 provides that an estate would be a separateperson if the heirs or the personal representative of the estate make asignificant contribution of active personal labor or active personal managementand the estate makes a significant contribution of capital, equipment,or land. An estate will not be considered to be actively engaged in farmingafter three years unless the heirs or the personal representative provideevidence that the estate is still in effect for substantive reasons unrelatedto the application of the payment limitation provisions. In addition, 7CFR 1497.12 provides that if the deceased would have been combined withanother person for purposes of 7 CFR Part 1497, such person and the estatewill continue to be combined. Section 1001(5)(E) of the 1985 Act requires that a change in a farmingoperation which results in an increase in the number of persons must bebona fide and substantive. Accordingly, 7 CFR 1497.18 sets forth provisionsapplicable to changes in farming operations. Section 1305(b) of the 1987Act provides that the Secretary may waive these provisions in order toallow for the equitab1e reorganization of farming operations so long asthe reorganization is completed prior to the final date by which producersmust execute a contract to participate in the 1989 commodity programs andthe reorganization will not result in an increase in the amount of programpayments. Accordingly, 7 CFR 1497.26 provides that the Deputy Administratormay approve such reorganizations as bona fide and substantive to the extentthat payments are not increased. Section 1305(d) of the 1987 Act provides that this part shall apply toall Conservation Reserve Program contracts entered into on or after December22, 1987. However, since the final rule which will set forth the regulationswhich implement this section did not become effective until after the executionof such contracts, the provisions of 7 CFR Part 795 will apply to suchcontracts unless the producer elects in writing to use the provisions of7 CFR Part 1497 for contracts entered into on or after December 22, 1987and before August 1, 1988. Accordingly, 7 CFR 1497.1 provides that thispart will apply to contracts entered into with respect to the program specifiedin 7 CFR 1497.1(a)(3) on or after August 1, 1988. Section 1001(7) of the 1985 Act provides that the Secretary shall establishtime limits for the various steps involved in administrative appeals withrespect to the application of the maximum payment limitation provisions.Accordingly, 7 CFR 1497.2(f) and 1497.27 set forth the time limits whichapply to initial determinations and disputes rising under 7 CFR Part 1497.In accordance with the final provisions of 7 CFR Part 1497, the followingdeterminations would be made: Landowner <T3>Example 1. </T3>Landowner A rents land for one-fourth of the crop toCorporation B. Landowner A's share of the profits or losses from the farmingoperation are commensurate with the landowner's contribution to the operationand the contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Landowner A is considered to be actively engagedin farming. The actively engaged determination for Corporation B will bedetermined separately. <T3>Example 2. </T3>AB Partnership consists of Individual A and IndividualB. AB Partnership owns land and rents the land to Individual E for one-thirdof the crop. The general partnership's share of the profits or losses fromthe farming operation are commensurate with the partnership's contributionto the operation and the contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>A general partnership is not considered to be a``person'' for payment limitation purposes and, therefore, would not beconsidered to be actively engaged in farming with respect to the landownerprovision. However, Individual A and Individual B may be considered activelyengaged in farming under the landowner provision if the provisions of thepartnership agreement provide that each would have an interest in the landwhen the partnership is dissolved. If any partner is specified in the partnershipagreement as not receiving a share of the land when the partnership dissolves,such partner would be required to make a significant contribution of eitheractive personal management and/or active personal labor in order to beconsidered actively engaged in farming. <T3>Example 3. </T3>Individual A is the owner and operator of the farm.Individual A hires the management needed for the operation from a managementcompany. Individual A hires a custom farmer for all labor that is neededfor the farm. Individual A borrows capital from a source who has no interestin the farm or farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual A is considered to be actively engagedin farming due to the landowner provision. <T3>Example 4. </T3>Corporation B owns a farm that is share rented to anotherproducer. Corporation B does not contribute capital, equipment, activepersonal labor or active personal management to the farming operation.<T3>Determination. </T3>Corporation B is considered to be actively engagedin farming due to the landowner provision. <T3>Example 5. </T3>Individual C owns a farm that is leased on a sharerent basis to Producer D. Individual C also rents land owned by CorporationA on a share rent basis. On the farming operation rented, Individual Ccontributes a significant amount of capital and hires all the labor andmanagement. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual C is considered to be actively engagedin farming with respect to the land owned by Individual C. However, onthe farming operation Individual C rents, Individual C would not be consideredto be actively engaged in farming since such individual does not contributea significant amount of either active personal labor or active personalmanagement. <T3>Example 6. </T3>Individual E, Trust F, Individual G, and Estate H ownland each with a 25 percent undivided interest. All land owned in thisfarming operation is leased on a share rent basis. None of the landownerscontribute capital, equipment, active personal labor, or active personalmanagement to the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Since each individual has an interest in the land,each will be considered to be actively engaged in farming due to the landownerprovision. Landlord <T3>Example 1. </T3>Landowner A cash leases land to Individual B. IndividualB subleases the land to Operator C. Individual B contributes land and doesnot contribute a signiiicant amount oi active personal labor or activepersonal management to the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual B is not actively engaged in farming.Individual B cannot be considered to be actively engaged in farming dueto the landowner provision, since Individual B is a landlord and not alandowner. Landowner A is not actively engaged on this farming operationsince cash rent is received for the use of the land, but may be activelyengaged with respect to another iarming operation. A separate determinationwill be made for Operator C.<T3>Example 2. </T3>Individual D cash leases land from Landowner E. IndividualD subleases the land to Producer C on a share rent basis. Individual Dcontributes the land and active personal management to the farming operation.<T3>Determination. </T3>Since Individual D cash rents the land, IndividualD cannot be considered to be a landowner and, therefore, cannot be consideredactively engaged in farming due to the landowner provision but must contributea significant amount of either active personal labor or active personalmanagement. Since Individual D has provided a significant contributionof land and active personal management, Individual D will be consideredto be actively engaged in farming. A separate determination will be madefor Producer C. Landowner E is not considered to be actively engaged infarming with respect to this farming operation, but may be actively engagedwith respect to another farming operation. Individual <T3>Example 1. </T3>Individual Z, a producer, rents 1,500 acres of landon a share rent basis. Individual Z owns the equipment and contributesat least 50 percent of the producer's commensurate share of active personallabor and contributes 100 percent of the producer's active personal management.In this situation, Individual Z's share of the profits or losses from thefarming operation are commensurate with the contribution to the operationand the contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual Z is considered to be actively engagedin farming. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Individual A rents land on a share rent basis. IndividualA contributes a significant amount of leased equipment and a significantamount of active personal management to the farming operation. Capitalis borrowed from another producer on the farm at the prevailing interestrate. The labor needed for Individual A's part of the farming operationis hired. Individual A's share of the profits or losses from the farmingoperation are commensurate with Individual A's contribution to the operationand the contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual A is considered to be actively engagedin farming since Individual A contributes a significant amount of bothequipment and active personal management. A contribution of capital, equipment,or land used to meet the significant contribution provision must be providedfrom a fund or account separate from that of any individual or entity whohas a direct or indirect interest in the farm. The fact that the capital,in this example, is borrowed from a person that has an interest in thefarm has no bearing on the significant contribution requirement since capitalwas not a contribution to meet the significant contribution provision.However, if the equipment lease was financed by a producer with an interestin the farm, Individual A would not be considered to be actively engagedin farming since none of the contributions were provided from a fund oraccount separate from that of any individual or entity having a director indirect interest in the farm. <T3>Example 3. </T3>Individual B share leases and participates in the ConservationReserve Program on a farm that is owned by Landowner C. Individual B contributesa significant amount of both active personal labor and active personalmanagement in the planting of pine trees which are used to control erosion.Individual B also contributes a significant amount of capital by payingthe cost of the trees that is not covered by the cost share practice orLandowner C. Individual B also hires some labor to plant the pine trees.<T3>Determination. </T3>Individual B is considered to be actively engagedin farming since such individual contributes capital, and active personallabor and active personal management. Landowner C is also considered tobe actively engaged in farming on the basis that C is a landowner. <T3>Example 4. </T3>Individual W provides water with respect to a ricecrop produced on Individual Z's farming operation. Individual W owns theequipment needed to pump and apply the water for the rice crop and determineswhen to apply the water. Individual W receives a share of the rice cropin payment for the application of water to the rice crop. In this situation,Individual W's share of the profits or losses from the farming operationare commensurate with the contribution to the operation and the contributionsare at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual W is considered actively engaged infarming since Individual W has provided a significant contribution of equipmentand active personal management. Sharecropper <T3>Example 1. </T3>Individual Y provides labor for Landowner Z on 500acres of rice in exchange for a share of the crop. Individual Y only contributesactive personal labor to the farming operation. Landowner Z provides IndividualY with housing, equipment, and with credit for food, seed, chemicals, fertilizer,and fuel. Individual Y also receives a cash advance that will be set offfrom the proceeds of the crop after harvest. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual Y is considered to be actively engagedin farming since Individual Y is a sharecropper. Landowner Z is consideredto be actively engaged in farming since Z is a landowner. Joint Operation <T3>Example 1. </T3>Partnership AB farms 2,000 acres of land. The partnershipowns the equipment and the individual partners provide at least 50 percentof their commensurate share of active personal labor and a significantamount of active personal management. Each partner's share of the profitsor losses from the farming operation are commensurate with the partner'scontribution to the operation and their contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Partner A and Partner B are considered to be activelyengaged in farming. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Partnership CD farms 2,000 acres of land. Each of theindividual partners contribute a significant amount of both capital andactive personal management to the farming operation. Labor is hired. Equipmentand land are rented from third parties. Each partner's share of the profitsor losses from the farming operation are commensurate with the partner'scontribution to the operation and their contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Partner C and Partner D are considered to be activelyengaged in farming. <T3>Example 3. </T3>Partnership X consists of 3 partners who are CorporationD, Individual A, and Partnership BC. Corporation D provides a significantamount of capital to the farming operation and a significant amount ofactive personal management. Corporation D finances Individual A's equipmentcontribution at the prevailing interest rate. Individual A also contributesthe use of Individual A's owned land and a significant amount of activepersonal labor. Partnership BC contributes most of the equipment used inthe farming operation and Partners B and C contribute a significant amountof both active personal labor and active personal management. <T3>Determination. </T3>Assuming that each partner's share of PartnershipX is commensurate, Corporation D, Individual A, and partnership membersB and C are each considered to be actively engaged in farming. Despitethe fact that individual A is financed by Corporation D for the equipmentcontribution, Individual A is considered to be actively engaged in farmingbecause of the significant contribution of land and active personal laborto the farming operation.<T3>Example 4. </T3>Partnership ABC consists of 3 partners. Each of thepartners claim a one third share of the partnership. Partner A providesa significant amount of owned equipment and a significant amount of activepersonal labor. Partner B provides a significant amount of capital anda significant amount of active personal labor. Partner C provides a significantamount of equipment and a significant amount of active personal labor andactive personal management. Partner B and Partner C's contribution to thepartnership are commensurate with their claimed shares of the partnership.Partner B had informed the county ASC committee that Partner B was goingto loan Partner A capital, at the prevailing interest rate, so that PartnerA could make a capital contribution to the partnership in order to makePartner A's total contribution to the partnership commensurate with PartnerA's claimed share of the partnership. During the end of year review thecounty ASC committee discovers that Partner B's loan to Partner A was anon interest bearing loan. <T3>Determination. </T3>Partners B and C are determined to be activelyengaged in farming because of their significant contributions of capital,equipment, labor and management and because their claimed shares of thepartnership are commensurate with their contributions and are at risk.Partner A's contribution was not commensurate with Partner A's claimedshare of the partnership and, therefore, Partner A is determined to notbe actively engaged in farming even though Partner A made a significantcontribution of equipment and active personal labor. The loan which PartnerB made to Partner A was not at the prevailing interest rate and was, therefore,not a contribution by Partner A. Limited Partnerships, Corporations, and Other Similar Entities <T3>Example 1. </T3>Corporation XYZ rents 3,000 acres of land for one-fourthshare of the crop. Corporation XYZ contributes a significant amount ofcapital to the operation. Stockholders, owning a total of 50 percent ofCorporation XYZ, contribute a significant amount of active personal labor.The stockholder's share of the profits or losses from the farming operationare commensurate with their contributions to the operation and the contributionsare at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Corporation XYZ is considered to be actively engagedin farming and is one ``person'' for payment limitation purposes. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Corporation AB consists of Father A and Son B, eachhaving a 50 percent share. Father A is a retired farmer who created thecorporation for tax reasons and to aid in the transfer of the farm to SonB. The corporation contributes a significant amount of capital and equipmentto the farming operation. Son B contributes a significant amount of bothactive personal labor and active personal management to the farming operation;however, most of the labor is provided by hired laborers. Father A liveson the farm and contributes a token amount of active personal management.<T3>Determination. </T3>Since Son B has at least a 50 percent share ofthe corporation, his significant contribution of active personal laborand active personal management would be enough to qualify the corporationas being actively engaged in farming. Since the corporation provides atleast one of the required contributions of capital, equipment, or landand Son B, one of the corporation's stockholders, who has a 50 percentownership interest, contributes active personal labor and active personalmanagement, Corporation AB is considered to be actively engaged in farmingand is considered to be one ``person'' for payment limitation purposes.<T3>Example 3. </T3>Corporation GH consists of Husband G owning 25 percentof the stock of the corporation and Wife H owning 30 percent of the stockin the corporation. Corporation GH provides all the capital, equipment,and land for the farming operation. Husband G and Wife H provide a significantamount of both active personal labor and active personal management. <T3>Determination. </T3>Corporation GH is actively engaged in farming sinceHusband G and Wife H provide a significant amount of both active personallabor and active personal management. Since Husband G and Wife H collectivelyown more than 50 percent of the stock of the corporation, Husband G, WifeH, and Corporation GH are considered to be one person for payment limitationpurposes. <T3>Example 4. </T3>Father J conducts an individual farming operation onowned land. Corporation JKL conducts a farming operation on owned land.Father J also owns 50 percent of the stock of Corporation JKL and TrustKL (an irrevocable trust for the benefit of Father J's two minor children)owns 50 percent of the stock. <T3>Determination. </T3>Father J and Corporation JKL are considered tobe actively engaged in farming due to the landowner provision. However,Father J and Corporation JKL are considered to be one person for paymentlimitation purposes because Father J owns more than 50 percent of the stockof the corporation, including stock owned by an irrevocable trust for thebenefit of such individual's minor children. <T3>Example 5. </T3>Individuals M, N, and O own stock in two corporationsand each has a separate and distinct farming operation on land that theyindividually own. Corporation MN has stockholders M and N, owning 60 and40 percent of the stock, respectively. Corporation MO has stockholdersM and O, owning 70 and 30 percent of the stock, respectively. CorporationsMN and MO each have a separate and distinct farming operation on land ownedby each individual corporation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individuals M, N, and O, and Corporations MN andMO are considered to be actively engaged in farming due to the landownerprovision. Because Individual M owns more than 50 percent interest in bothcorporations, Individual M is considered to be one ``person'' with bothcorporations. Individuals N and O are considered to be separate personson their individual farming operations and are considered to be activelyengaged in farming due to the landowner provision. <T3>Example 6. </T3>Corporation X has stockholders A, B, C, and D, owning30 percent, 20 percent, 15 percent, and 35 percent, respectively. CorporationY has stockholders A, B, C, and E, owning 10 percent, 20 percent, 25 percent,and 45 percent, respectively. Each corporation farms land owned by thecorporation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Corporations X and Y are both considered to beactively engaged in farming due to the landowner provision. However, CorporationX and Corporation Y are considered to be one person for payment limitationpurposes since the same two or more stockholders own more than 50 percentof the stock in each of two corporations having farming interests. Irrevocable Trusts <T3>Example 1. </T3>EF Trust, with Individual E and Individual F, eachhaving an interest of 50 percent, contributes a significant amount of capitalto the farming operation. Each beneficiary contributes a significant amountof active personal management. All labor is hired. The land and equipmentare leased. The beneficiaries' share of the profits or losses from thefarming operation are commensurate with the beneficiaries' contributionto the operation and the contributions are at risk. Individual E also hasanother farming interest as an individual. <T3>Determination. </T3>EF Trust is considered to be actively engaged infarming since the trust provides capital, and the beneficiaries contributea significant amount of active personal management. The trust is consideredto be one ``person'' for payment limitation purposes. Individual E mayalso be considered to be a separate person with respect to Individual E'sindividual farming operation.<T3>Example 2. </T3>Individual G is a 100 percent income beneficiary ofG Trust. G Trust contributes a significant amount of both equipment andcapital to the farming operation. Individual G contributes at least 50percent of the operation's active personal labor. G Trust leases all landand hires all management and 50 percent of the labor. Individual G alsohas farming interests as an individual. <T3>Determination. </T3>G Trust is considered to be actively engaged infarming. Individual G and G Trust are considered to be one ``person'' forpayment limitation purposes because Individual G is the sole income beneficiaryof the trust. <T3>Example 3. </T3>Testamentary Trust Z has beneficiaries A, B, and C,and is the owner and operator of a farming operation. Trust Y has beneficiariesA, B, and C. The corpus of the Trust Y consists of stocks, bonds, notesreceivable, urban real estate, and cropland that is share leased to a separateindividual. <T3>Determination. </T3>Testamentary Trust Z and Trust Y are consideredto be actively engaged in farming due to the landowner provision. However,Testamentary Trust Z and Trust Y are considered to be one person for paymentlimitation purposes because the same two or more beneficiaries have morethan a 50 percent interest in two or more irrevocable trusts. <T3>Example 4. </T3>A widow owns and operates farm property. Under thewill of her late husband, certain specific bequests of cash and non-farmproperty were made to persons other than the widow. The balance of theestate, including farmland, is distributed to a testamentary trust. Thewidow has the sole right to the income of the trust during her lifetime.At the time of her death, the trust is to be terminated and the propertydistributed to her heirs. <T3>Determination. </T3>Since the widow has the sole right to income ofthe trust during her lifetime, she is considered the sole beneficiary andtherefore one person with the trust for payment limitation purposes. Thetrust would be considered to be actively engaged in farming due to thelandowner provision. Revocable Trusts <T3>Example 1. </T3>ST Trust is a revocable trust with Individual S andIndividual T as beneficiaries, each having an interest of 50 percent. IndividualU is the grantor. ST Trust contributes a significant amount of both capitaland equipment to the farming operation. The beneficiaries each contributea significant amount of active personal management to the operation. Allland is leased and all labor is hired. The beneficiaries share of the profitsor losses from the farming operation are commensurate with their contributionto the operation and the contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>ST Trust is considered to be actively engaged infarming. ST Trust and Individual U are considered to be one ``person''for payment limitation purposes because Individual U is the grantor ofa revocable trust. <T3>Example 2. </T3>BP Trust is a revocable trust with Individual B andMinor P as beneficiaries. Grandfather G is the grantor. Individual B contributesa significant amount of active personal management to the farming operation.The trust provides all the capital and land. The trust also hires a personto provide the labor required for the farming operation. Minor P does notprovide any contribution to the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>BP Trust is considered to be actively engaged infarming. One beneficiary provides the required contribution of active personalmanagement and the trust provides the required contribution of capitaland land. BP Trust and Grandfather G are considered to be one ``person''for payment limitation purposes because Grandfather G is the grantor ofthe revocable trust. Estates <T3>Example 1. </T3>E Estate is formed upon the death of Individual E inFebruary of 1989. Individual B is the sole heir of the estate and providesa significant amount of active personal management. E Estate provides equipmentand rented land. All labor is hired. Individual B also has individual farminginterests. All contributions are commensurate and are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>E Estate is considered to be actively engaged infarming since the heir (Individual B) has provided a significant amountof active personal management and the estate has provided equipment andland. Although Individual B is the sole heir of the estate, IndividualB and the estate are not considered to be one ``person'' because, priorto the death, Individual E and Individual B would not have been combinedas one ``person''. Therefore, if Individual B is determined to be activelyengaged in farming with respect to the separate farming operation, IndividualB may be considered to be a separate ``person'' from E Estate. <T3>Example 2. </T3>C Estate was formed in October 1988 upon the deathof Individual C. The heirs are Individual E, F, and G, each having a one-thirdinterest. Prior to the death of Individual C, Individual C owned equipmentand all of the acreage farmed was cash leased. Individual E will serveas executor for the estate. For 1989, C Estate will cash lease land. CEstate will contribute a significant amount of cash rented land, ownedequipment, and capital for the farming operation. Individual E will providea significant amount of active personal management with the estate hiringall labor. All contributions are commensurate and are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>C Estate is considered to be actively engaged infarming. The heirs may also be considered to be separate persons with respectto other farming operations if all conditions are met for such operation.<T3>Example 3. </T3>Y Estate is formed in August 1989 upon the death ofIndividual Y. Prior to death, Individual Y had been determined to be activelyengaged in farming and had entered into a contract to participate in the1989 Acreage Reduction Program. Y Estate will continue to farm the acreagethat was leased to Individual Y, as a successor-in-interest. Y Estate willhire any labor and management that is needed for the farming operation.<T3>Determination. </T3>Y Estate is considered to be actively engaged infarming because Individual Y was determined to be actively engaged in farmingand had executed a contract to participate in the program prior to death.However, to continue to be actively engaged in farming for the followingyear, the heirs or personal representative of the estate will have to providea significant amount of active personal labor or active personal managementand the estate will have to provide a significant amount of capital, equipment,or land. Cash Rent Tenants <T3>Example 1. </T3>Individual B rents 800 acres of cropland from LandownerC. Individual B contributes 80 percent of all the active personal laborand capital to the farming operation. 20 percent of the labor is hiredand 100 percent of the management is hired. Individual B's share of theprofits or losses from the farming operation are commensurate with IndividualB's contributions to the operation and the contributions are at risk. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual B is considered to be actively engagedin farming and will be considered a separate ``person'' from the landowner.<T3>Example 2. </T3>Individual C rents 800 acres of cropland from LandownerD. Individual C contributes 100 percent of the active personal managementand capital needed for the operation. 100 percent of the labor is hired.The equipment is leased from the landowner at a fair market value. IndividualC's share of the profits or losses from the farming operation are commensuratewith Individual C's contributions to the operation and the contributionsare at risk.<T3>Determination. </T3>Individual C is considered to be actively engagedin farming. Individual C is contributing a significant amount of both activepersonal management and is contributing equipment. In this situation, IndividualC and Landowner D would not be considered to be one person. A cash renttenant may contribute active personal labor and capital, equipment, orland and be considered to be actively engaged in farming and considereda separate person from the landowner. If a cash rent tenant contributesactive personal management and does not make a significant contributionof active personal labor, such tenant must also make a significant contributionof equipment to the farming operation. The equipment may be owned by IndividualC or it may be leased or rented from another source, including the landownerif leased at a fair market value. <T3>Example 3. </T3>Individual E is a cash rent tenant. Individual E contributesa significant amount of capital, land, and active personal management tothe farming operation. Individual E hires a custom farmer, who has hisown equipment, to provide the labor needed on the farm. The custom farmeris compensated by receiving a share of the crop. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual E is considered to be actively engagedin farming, but will be combined with the landowner because IndividualE is not providing equipment or active personal labor. The custom farmeris no longer considered to be a custom farmer since a share of the cropis received as payment, but Individual E and the custom farmer are consideredto be a joint operation since there is a sharing of the crop. The customfarmer shall be considered to be actively engaged in farming and a separate``person'' from Individual E. <T3>Example 4. </T3>Individual D is a cash rent tenant and contributesa significant amount of both equipment and active personal management tothe farming operation. The equipment is leased from a custom farmer whois hired to provide the labor necessary for the farming operation. However,the equipment leased is also used by the custom farmer on other farmingoperations. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual D is considered to be actively engagedin farming; however, Individual D is considered to be one person with thelandlord. If the equipment is leased from the same person providing thelabor, the equipment must be under the control of Individual D during thecurrent crop year. If the custom farmer used another line of equipmentfor the other farming operations, Individual D would be considered to beactively engaged in farming. The custom farmer is not considered to beactively engaged with respect to this farming operation, but may be determinedto be actively engaged with respect to another farming operation. Thisdetermination would be the same if the person providing the equipment wasnot a custom farmer. Family Member <T3>Example 1. </T3>Father A has been farming owned land and rented landfor approximately 15 years. Son B, an adult, is starting to farm with hisfather. Son B contributes a significant amount of active personal labor.Father A contributes all of the farming operation's capital, equipment,and active personal management. <T3>Determination. </T3>Father A and Son B are both considered to be activelyengaged in farming and would be considered to be two persons. <T3>Example 2. </T3>In 1988, Partnership CD consisted of Individual C andGrandfather D. For 1989, however, Grandson E is brought into the farmingoperation. Individual C contributes all the capital and a significant amountof active personal management. Grandfather D contributes the use of a significantamount of equipment, owned land, and active personal management. GrandsonE will provide all the active personal labor. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual C, Grandfather D, and Grandson E willeach be considered to be actively engaged in farming. The county ASC committeewill determine whether the claimed shares are commensurate with each partner'scontribution to the farming operation. <T3>Example 3. </T3>Father Y has a large farming operation, part of whichis owned and part of which he share leases. In 1989, Son Z subleases threefarms from Father Y and farms them as a separate farming operation. FatherY provides Son Z with all the needed capital and equipment. Son Z contributesa significant amount of both active personal labor and active personalmanagement to the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Son Z is not considered to be actively engagedin farming. Son Z does not qualify with respect to the family member provisionsince he was not brought into a family farming operation. If Father Y hadformed a joint operation with his son, then Son Z would have been consideredto be actively engaged in farming with respect to the family member provision.A separate actively engaged determination would need to be made for FatherY. <T3>Example 4. </T3>ABC Partnership is a family held partnership consistingof Father A, Son B, and Daughter C. In 1989, Father A brings Son-in-lawD into the farming operation. Daughter C, who is married to Son-in-lawD, does not provide a significant amount of active personal labor or activepersonal management to the farming operation. Son B contributes a significantamount of capital, active personal labor, and active personal management.Father A originally contributed his owned equipment to the partnershipand contributes some capital and a significant amount of active personalmanagement. Son-in-law D contributes a significant amount of both activepersonal labor and active personal management to the farming operation.<T3>Determination. </T3>Father A, Son B, and Son-in-law D are each consideredto be actively engaged in farming. Daughter C is not considered to be activelyengaged in farming. Son-in law D was brought into the farming operationusing the family member provision. If Daughter C made a significant contributionof active personal labor or active personal management, then Son-in lawD would not have been considered to be actively engaged in farming withrespect to the family member provision. <T3>Example 5. </T3>Mother A, Daughter B, and Son C are partners in a familypartnership. Son D, a minor, becomes a partner in 1989. Mother A contributesa significant amount of both capital and active personal management. DaughterB contributes a significant amount of both capital and active personalmanagement. Son C contributes a significant amount of equipment, activepersonal labor, and active personal management. Son D contributes a significantamount of active personal labor. <T3>Determination. </T3>Mother A, Daughter B, and Son C are consideredto be actively engaged in farming. However, Son D is not considered tobe actively engaged in farming due to the family member provision sincehe is not an adult family member. Husband and Wife <T3>Example 1. </T3>Husband A and Wife B both were involved in separateunrelated farming operations prior to their marriage. Husband A rents 1,000acres of cropland for one-fourth of the crop. Wife B owns land that wasgiven to her by her father before her marriage to Husband A. Both operationshave been kept separate and distinct during the marriage. Both personshave been determined to be actively engaged in farming. <T3>Determination. </T3>Husband A and Wife B would be considered to beseparate persons for payment limitation purposes as both farming operationshave remained separate and distinct. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Husband G owns 500 acres of land that he rents to ProducerZ for one-third of the crop. Wife D also owns 500 acres of land which wasgiven to her before her marriage by her grandfather and is rented to ProducerZ for one-third of the crop. The financing and accounting for each personhas been kept totally separate and distinct. <T3>Determination. </T3>Husband G and Wife D are each considered to beactively engaged in farming due to the landowner provision. Each will beconsidered to be a separate ``person'' since all aspects of the farmingoperations were kept separate and distinct.<T3>Example 3. </T3>Husband C owns 500 acres of land that is rented toProducer Y for one-fourth of the crop. Wife E owns 600 acres of land whichwas bought by her before her marriage and is rented to Producer Y for one-fourthof the crop. Both farms were reconstituted as one farm when both rentedtheir land to Producer Y because they were being farmed as a single farmingunit. Accounting and farming operations were not kept separate after thereconstitution. <T3>Determination. </T3>Husband C and Wife E are each considered to beactively engaged in farming with respect to the landowner provision; however,because the farming operations were not kept separate and distinct, theywould be considered to be one ``person'' for payment limitation purposes.Minor Children <T3>Example 1. </T3>Minor A has a farming operation in which Parents Band C have no interest. Minor A maintains housing separate from ParentsB and C. Minor A contributes a significant amount of equipment leased froman unrelated party, active personal labor, and active personal managementto the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Minor A would be considered to be actively engagedin farming. Minor A and Parents B and C would be considered to be separatepersons since Minor A maintains a separate household. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Minor D has a farming operation in which neither parenthas an interest. However, Minor D does not have a separate household. MinorD's parents are divorced and Minor D's mother has custody of Minor D. MinorD contributes a significant amount of leased equipment, active personallabor, and active personal management to the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Minor D is determined to be actively engaged infarming but will be combined with Minor D's mother because all of the provisionsconcerning a minor have not been met. Minor D is not combined with thefather because the mother has custody of Minor D. Indian Tribal Ventures <T3>Example 1. </T3>Indian tribal venture AB farms owned land. The Bureauof Indian Affairs (BIA) has certified that payments exceeding the applicablepayment limitation with respect to such land will not accrue directly orindirectly to any individual Indian, including the spouse or minor childrenof such Indian. Individual Indians also farm land owned by third parties.<T3>Determination. </T3>The BIA certification is effective only for landowned by the Indian tribal venture. Each individual Indian farming landowned by third parties must certify that individually they will not receivepayments exceeding the applicable payment limitation with respect to boththe earnings from the tribal venture's farming operation and their individualfarming operation. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Indian tribal venture CD farms both owned land andland that is leased to the tribal venture. The tribal venture providesall the capital and equipment, but only a few members of the tribal venturecontribute a significant amount of active personal labor or active personalmanagement to the farming operation on the leased land. BIA certifies thatno one Indian accrues directly or indirectly more than the applicable limitationfor land that is owned by the tribal venture. Some members of the tribalventure lease land and farm as individuals, contributing significant amountsof leased equipment, active personal labor, or active personal management.<T3>Determination. </T3>The tribal venture is considered to be activelyengaged in farming with respect to land that is owned and may earn paymentsin excess of the applicable payment limitation since no individual Indianreceives payments in excess of the applicable payment limitation. The landthat is leased by the tribal venture must qualify under the same provisionsthat apply to joint operations. Therefore, for land leased to the tribalventure, each member of the joint venture must contribute a significantamount of active personal labor or active personal management to the farmingoperation to be considered actively engaged in farming. Each individualIndian must certify that individually they will not receive payments exceedingthe applicable payment limitation with respect to both the earnings fromthe tribal venture's farming operation and their individual farming operation.BIA's certification is only applicable for the land that is owned by theIndian tribal venture. The tribal venture must complete the necessary formsfor the county ASC committee to determine if the members of the tribalventure are actively engaged with respect to the leased land. The individualIndian must also complete the necessary forms for the county ASC committeeto determine if such individual is actively engaged in farming. States, Political Subdivisions, or Agencies Thereof <T3>Example. </T3>The State of X, City Y of State X, and Agency Z of theState of X each own cropland. The land is leased to individual farmingoperations for a share of the crop. <T3>Determination. </T3>The State of X, City Y, and Agency Z are consideredto be one ``person'' and are actively engaged in farming due to the landownerprovision. Bona Fide and Substantive Changes <T3>Example 1. </T3>Corporation A owned equally by Stockholders B, C, D,and E, owns and operates a farm. Individuals C, D, and E form General PartnershipX that leases land from Corporation A for a share of the crop. GeneralPartnership X also leases land from Individual S, on which CorporationA has never farmed, for a share of the crop. The land leased from IndividualS reflects approximately a 20 percent increase in cropland from the landbeing farmed by Corporation A. The crop acreage bases on the increasedland is normal for the area. Partnership X provides a significant amountof both equipment and capital. Partners C, D, and E provide a significantamount of active personal labor and active personal management. <T3>Determination. </T3>A bona fide and substantive change has occurred,as the size of the farming operation has been increased by at least 20percent with crop acreage bases normal for the area by leasing additionalcropland from Individual S. Corporation A is considered actively engagedin farming due to the landowner provision and is considered a separateperson. Members C, D, and E are each considered to be actively engagedin farming, since each member provides a significant amount of active personallabor and active personal management and Partnership X provided a significantamount of equipment and land. Individual S is considered to be activelyengaged in farming due to the landowner provision. Corporation A, MembersC, D, and E, and Individual S are each considered to be separate ``persons''for payment limitation purposes. <T3>Example 2. </T3>Father A has previously conducted an individual farmingoperation consisting of owned land. For the current year, Father A proposesto expand the operation by forming a joint venture with his adult daughtersB and C, with each member having equal shares. No additional acreage isfarmed, but Father A has gifted to each daughter one-third of the ownedland. <T3>Determination. </T3>A bona fide and substantive change has occurredsince a gift of land commensurate with the individuals' share of the farmingoperation has been received. Father A and Daughters B and C are consideredto be actively engaged in farming due to the landowner provision.<T3>Example 3. </T3>Brother D has conducted a individual farming operationconsisting of owned land. For the current year, Brother D proposes to expandthe operation by forming a partnership with Sister E. Brother D will receive75 percent of the partnership earnings and Sister E will receive 25 percentof the partnership earnings. Brother D sold the equipment that will beused to plant and harvest the crop to Sister E who receives financing froma commercial lending institution. Brother D provides a significant amountof both active personal labor and active personal management. Sister Eprovides a significant amount of active personal management. <T3>Determination. </T3>A bona fide and substantive change has occurredsince a sale of equipment commensurate with the individuals' share of thefarming operation has taken place. Brother D is considered to be activelyengaged in farming due to both the landowner and individual provisions.Sister E is considered to be actively engaged in farming since she providesa significant amount of both equipment and active personal management.Section 1001C of the 1985 Act provides with respect to the 1989 and 1990crops that any person who is not a citizen of the United States or an alienlawfully admitted into the United States for permanent residence shallbe ineligible to receive any type of production adjustment payment, pricesupport program loan, payment, or benefit made available under the 1949Act, the Commodity Credit Corporation Charter Act, as amended (the ``CharterAct''), or Subtitle D of Title XII of the 1985 Act with respect to anycommodity produced, or any land set aside from production, on a farm thatis owned or operated by such person. However, such an individual who isproviding land, capital, and a substantial amount of personal labor inthe production of crops on such a farm would not be ineligible to receivesuch payments, loans, and benefits. Section 1001C of the 1985 Act also provides that a corporation or otherentity shall be ineligible to receive such payments, loans, or other benefitsif more than 10 percent of the beneficial ownership of the entity is heldby persons who are not citizens of the United States or aliens lawfullyadmitted to the United States for permanent residence unless such personsprovide a substantial amount of active personal labor in the productionof crops produced on the farm. The Secretary is also authorized to makepayments, loans, and other benefits to such an ineligible entity in anamount which the Secretary determines to be representative of the percentageinterests in the entity that is owned by citizens of the United Statesand aliens lawfully admitted to the United States for permanent residence.Accordingly, this final rule would set forth at 7 CFR Part 1498 the regulationswhich implement section 1001C of the 1985 Act with respect to the 1989and 1990 crops. For purposes of 7 CFR Part 1498, the terms ``person,''``entity,'' ``capital,'' ``land,'' and ``active personal labor'' are definedin 7 CFR 1498.3 in virtually the same manner as in 7 CFR 1497.3. Thosepayments, loans, and benefits which are subject to the provisions of 7CFR Part 1498 are defined in 7 CFR 1498.3 as any cash or in-kind payment,loan disbursement or other benefit made in accordance with the 1949 Act,the Charter Act, and subtitle D of title XII of the 1985 Act which resultsin an expenditure by the Commodity Credit Corporation or any other Federalagency. The regulations at 7 CFR 1497.25, 1497.27 and 1497.28 set forth provisionswhich are applicable to: determinations of a scheme or device which aredesigned to evade 7 CFR Part 1497; the granting of equitable relief bythe Deputy Administrator; and the right to seek an administrative appealin accordance with 7 CFR Part 780. Similar provisions are set forth at7 CFR 1498.6, 1498.7, and 1498.8. In determining whether more than 10 percent of the beneficial ownershipof an entity is held by persons who are not citizens of the United Statesor by aliens lawfully admitted into the United States for permanent residence,7 CFR 1498.4 provides that such a determination is made based upon suchownership interest which is the higher of such amount on the date the applicableprogram contract or agreement is executed or as determined by the DeputyAdministrator, the final harvest date which is normal in the area for theapplicable program crop. Accordingly, any increase in the foreign ownershipof an entity after the date of execution of such a contract or agreementwill affect the eligibility of an entity to receive a payment, loan, andbenefit. Any payment, loan, and benefit which had been made prior to thedate on which the beneficial ownership requirement was exceeded would berequired to be refunded by the entity. In accordance with 7 CFR 1498.4, payments, loans, and benefits may be receivedby: (1) A citizen of the United States; (2) an alien legally admitted tothe United States for permanent residence; and (3) an entity which is notsubject to 7 CFR Part 1498 who, through such means as a lease, is in lawfulpossession of a farm owned by an entity or individual who is ineligibleto receive payments, loans, and benefits. Similarly, such individual orentity who is a successor-in-interest to a program contract or agreementexecuted by a foreign individual or entity with respect to such a farmmay be eligible to receive payments, loans, and benefits. In accordance with 7 CFR 1498.5, an entity subject to the provisions of7 CFR Part 1498 is required to provide to the county ASC committee or otherparty who is executing the program contract or agreement, the names andsocial security or tax identification numbers of all foreign individualsand foreign entities who have a beneficial ownership interest in an entity.Failure to provide such information will result in the ineligibility ofthe entity to receive any payment, loan, and benefit. Foreign Individual <T3>Example. </T3>Individual A is a foreign person who does not have anAlien Registration Receipt card. Individual A lives in another countryand makes yearly visits to the farm as well as making monthly phone callsto the foreman of the farming operation. Individual A hires all the laborrequired for the farming operation. Individual A contributes most of themanagement and all of the capital required for the farming operation. <T3>Determination. </T3>Individual A is not eligible to receive any typeof a production adjustment payment or a price support program loan withrespect to this farming operation. Individual A must contribute a substantialamount of active personal labor to be considered to be eligible for programpayments as specified in 7 CFR 1498.3 since Individual A is not a U.S.citizen or an alien lawfully admitted into the U.S. Individual A must alsomeet the requirements of 7 CFR Part 1497 to be eligible to receive a payment.Corporations in Which a Foreign Individual Has an Interest <T3>Example. </T3>Corporation ABC consists of Individual A having a 25percent share, Partnership B having a 25 percent share, and Foreign IndividualC having a 50 percent share. Individual A and the members of PartnershipB contribute a significant amount of active personal labor, active personalmanagement, and equipment. Foreign Individual C contributes capital andowned land to the farming operation. The county ASC committee has determinedthat the corporation is actively engaged in farming. <T3>Determination. </T3>Even though the county ASC committee has determinedthe corporation to be actively engaged in farming, the corporation maynot receive a full payment since Foreign Individual C does not contributea substantial amount of active personal labor. The stockholders who areU.S. citizens or aliens who are lawfully admitted into the U.S. may requesta payment which represents their share of the corporation's payment. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>7 CFR Part 1497 Price support programs. 7 CFR Part 1498 Aliens, Loan programs_agriculture, Grant programs_agriculture.Accordingly, this final rule amends Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulationsas follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 704_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 704 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1201, 1231-1244; Pub. L. 99-198, 99 Stat. 1354,as amended (16 U.S.C. 3801, 3831-3844). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 704.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>2. Section 704.16(c) is amended by removing the phrase ``Part 795'' andinserting in lieu thereof ``Parts 795, 1497, and 1498''. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 795_[AMENDED] </ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 795 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1001 of the Food Security Act of 1985, as amended,99 Stat. 1444, as amended, 7 U.S.C. 1308; Pub. L. 99-500 and Pub. L. 99-591.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 795.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>4. Section 795.2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) Except as provided in Part 1497 of this title, this part shall notbe applicabie to contracts entered into on or after August 1, 1988 in accordancewith Part 704 of this chapter. 5. A new Part 1497 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1497_PAYMENT LIMITATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.1 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.2 Administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.3 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.4 Timing for determining status of persons. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.5 Limitation on the number of entities through which an individualor entity may receive a payment and required notification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.6 General provisions for determining whether an individual orentity is actively engaged in farming. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.7 Individuals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.8 Joint operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.9 Limited partnerships, corporations and other similar entities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.10 Irrevocable trusts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.11 Revocable trusts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.12 Estates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.13 Landowners. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.14 Family members. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.15 Sharecroppers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.16  Cash rent tenants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.17 Persons not considered to be actively engaged in farming.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.18 Changes in farming operations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.19 Husband and wife. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.20 Minor children. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.21 Charitable organizations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.22 Indian tribal ventures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.23 States, political subdivisions, and agencies thereof. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.24 Scheme or device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.25 Joint and several liability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.26 Equitable adjustments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.27 Appeals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1497.28 Paperwork Reduction Act assigned number.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 1001 through 1001C of the Food Security Actof 1985, as amended, 99 Stat. 1444, as amended (7 U.S.C. 1308, et seq.).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>(a) This part is applicable to the following programs and any other programsas may be provided for in individual program regulations: (1) The annual price support and production adjustment programs for the1989 and subsequent crops of wheat, feed grains, upland cotton, extra longstaple cotton, and rice; (2) Any program authorized by the Agricultural Act of 1949 under whicha gain is realized by the repayment of a loan at a level lower than theoriginal loan level; (3) The Conservation Reserve Program; (b) This part shall be applied to the programs specified in paragraph (a)(1) and (2) on a crop year basis and with respect to the program in paragraph(a)(3) on a fiscal year basis. (c) This part is applicable to rental payments made in accordance witha Conservation Reserve Program contract entered into on or after August1, 1988. For Conservation Reserve Program contracts entered into on orafter December 22, 1987 and before August 1, 1988, the person may electto have the provisions of this part apply to such a contract by notifyingthe county committee in writing of such election.  (d) The regulations set forth at Part 795 of this title shall be applicableto Conservation Reserve Program contracts entered into prior to December22, 1987, and to Conservation Reserve Program contracts entered into onor after such date and before August 1, 1988, if the person has not madethe election specified in paragraph (c) of this section. (e) This part shall be used to determine whether certain individuals orlegal entities are to be treated as one person or as separate persons forthe purpose of applying the payment limitation provisions which are applicableto the programs specified in paragraph (a) of this section. (f) In cases in which more than one provision of this part are applicable,the provision which is most restrictive shall apply. (g) Payments made to public schools with respect to land which is ownedby a public school district and payments made to a State with respect toland owned by a State which is used to maintain a public school shall notbe subject to the payment limitations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administration. </ITAG>(a) The regulations in this part will be administered under the generalsupervision and direction of the Executive Vice President, CCC, and theAdministrator, ASCS. In the field, the regulations in this part will beadministered by the Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation State andcounty committees (herein referred to as ``State and county committees'',respectively). (b) State executive directors, county executive directors and State andcounty committees do not have authority to modify or waive any of the provisionsof this part. (c) The State committee may take any action authorized or required by thispart to be taken by the county committee which has not been taken by suchcommittee. The State committee may also: (1) Correct or require a county committee to correct any action taken bysuch county committee which is not in accordance with this part; or (2) Require a county committee to withhold taking any action which is notin accordance with this part. (d) No delegation herein to a State or county committee shall precludethe Executive Vice President, CCC, and the Administrator, ASCS, or a designee,from determining any question arising under this part or from reversingor modifying any determination made by a State or county committee. (e) The county committee shall make the initial ``actively engaged in farming''and ``person'' determinations within 60 days after the producer files therequired forms and any other supporting documentation needed in makingsuch determinations. If the determination is not made within 60 days, theproducer will receive a determination for that program year which reflectsthe determination sought by the producer unless the Deputy Administratordetermines that the producer did not follow the farm operating plan whichwas presented to the county committee for such year.(f) The county committee shall take into consideration the circumstancesinvolving individuals who have died or become incapacitated during theprogram year. If the individual dies or is incapacitated before a determinationis made that the individual is ``actively engaged in farming,'' the representativeof the deceased individual's estate or the incapacitated individual, orother person if necessary, must provide the county committee informationthat verifies that such individual did make a conscious effort to and wouldhave been determined to be actively engaged in farming if not for the individual'sdeath or incapacitation. If the individual dies or is incapacitated afterbeing determined to be ``actively engaged in farming,'' the county committeeshall allow such determination to be in effect for that program year. However,the following year such individual or the individual's estate must meetall necessary requirements in order to be determined to be ``actively engagedin farming'' for that year. (g) Data furnished by the producers will be used to determine eligibilityfor program benefits. Furnishing the data is voluntary; however, withoutit program benefits will not be provided. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions. </ITAG>(a) The terms defined in Part 719 of this chapter shall be applicable tothis part and all documents issued in accordance with this part, exceptas otherwise provided in this section. (b) The following definitions shall be applicable to this part: <T3>Active Personal Labor. </T3>Active personal labor is personally providingphysical activities necessary in a farming operation, including activitiesinvolved in land preparation, planting, cultivating, harvesting, and marketingof agricultural commodities in the farming operation. Other physical activitiesinclude those physical activities required to establish and maintain conservingcover crops or conserving use acreages and those physical activities necessaryin livestock operations. <T3>Active Personal Management. </T3>Active personal management is personallyproviding: (1) The general supervision and direction of activities and labor involvedin the farming operation; or (2) Providing services (whether performed on-site or off-site) reasonablyrelated and necessary to the farming operation including any of the following:(i) Supervision of activities necessary in the farming operation, includingactivities involved in land preparation, planting, cultivating, harvesting,and marketing of agricultural commodities, as well as activities requiredto establish and maintain conserving cover crops or conserving use acreageand activities required in livestock operations. (ii) Business-related actions which include discretionary decision-making;(iii) Evaluation of the financial condition and needs of the farming operation;(iv) Assistance in the structuring or preparation of financial reportsor analyses for the farming operation; (v) Consultations in or structuring of business-related financing arrangementsfor the farming operation; (vi) Marketing and promotion of agricultural commodities produced by thefarming operation; (vii) Acquiring technical information used in the farming operation; or(viii) Any other management function reasonably necessary to conduct thefarming operation and for which service the farming operation would ordinarilybe charged a fee. <T3>Capital. </T3>Capital consists of the funding provided by an individualor entity to the farming operation in order for such operation to conductfarming activities. In determining whether an individual or entity hascontributed capital to the farming operation, such capital must have beenderived from a fund or account separate and distinct from that of any otherindividual or entity involved in such operation. Capital does not includethe value of any labor or management which is contributed to the farmingoperation. A capital contribution may be a direct out-of-pocket input ofa specified sum or an amount borrowed by the individual or entity. Withrespect to a farming operation which consists of more than one individualor entity: (1) Such capital which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(b) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andmust not be acquired as a result of a loan made to: (i) The farming operation in which the individual or entity has an interest;(ii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation by the farming operationor any of its members, beneficiaries or related entities; or (iii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation, which was guaranteedor secured by the farming operation or any of its members, beneficiariesor related entities. (2) Such capital which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(d) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andif acquired as a result of a loan made to the individuals or entities providedin items (1)(i) through (1)(iii) of this definition the loan must be aloan bearing the prevailing interest rate. <T3>Entity. </T3>An entity is a corporation, joint stock company, association,limited partnership, irrevocable trust, revocable trust, estate, charitableorganization, or other similar organization including any such organizationparticipating in the farming operation as a partner in a general partnership,a participant in a joint venture, a grantor of a revocable trust, or asa participant in a similar organization. <T3>Equipment. </T3>Equipment is the machinery and implements needed bythe farming operation to conduct activities of the farming operation includingmachinery and implements involved in land preparation, planting, cultivating,harvesting, or marketing of the crops involved. Equipment also includesmachinery and implements needed to establish and maintain conservationcover crops or conservation use acreages and those needed to conduct livestockoperations. With respect to a farming operation which consists of morethan one individual or entity: (1) Such equipment which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(b) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andmust not have been acquired as a result of a loan made to: (i) The farming operation in which the individual or entity has an interest;(ii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation by the farming operationor any of its members, beneficiaries or related entities; or (iii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation, which was guaranteedor secured by the farming operation or any of its members, beneficiaries,or related entities. (2) Such equipment which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(d) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andif acquired as a result of a loan made to the individuals or entities providedin items (1)(i) through (1)(iii) of this definition the loan must be aloan bearing the prevailing interest rate. (3) Such equipment may be leased from any source. If such equipment isleased from another individual or entity with an interest in the farmingoperation, the equipment must be leased at a fair market value. <T3>Family Member. </T3>The term ``family member'' means an individualto whom another member in the farming operation is related as lineal ancestor,lineal descendant, or sibling, including spouses of those family memberswho do not make a significant contribution to the farming operation themselves.<T3>Farming operation. </T3>A farming operation is a business enterpriseengaged in the production of agricultural products which is operated byan individual or entity which is eligible to receive payments, directlyor indirectly, under one or more of the programs specified in andSection;1497.1. <T3>Joint operation. </T3>A joint operation is a general partnership, jointventure, or other similar business organization. <T3>Land. </T3>Land is farmland consisting of cropland, pastureland, wetland,or rangeland which meets the specific requirements of the applicable program.With respect to a farming operation which consists of more than one individualor entity: (1) Such land which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(b) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andmust not have been acquired as a result of a loan made to: (i) The farming operation in which the individual or entity has an interest;(ii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation by the farming operationor any of its members, beneficiaries, or related entities; or (iii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation, which was guaranteedor secured by the farming operation or any of its members, beneficiaries,or related entities. (2) Such land which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(d) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andif acquired as a result of a loan made to the individuals or entities providedin items (1)(i) through (1)(iii) of this definition the loan must be aloan bearing the prevailing interest rate. (3) Such land may be leased from any source. If such land is leased fromanother individual or entity with an interest in the farming operation,the land must be leased at a fair market value. <T3>Payment. </T3>A payment includes: (1) With respect to the programs specified in andSection; 1497.1 paragraph(a) (1) and (2): (i) Any part of any payment that is determined by the Deputy Administratorto represent compensation for resource adjustment (excluding land diversionpayments) or public access for recreation; (ii) Any disaster payment made under one or more of the annual programsfor a commodity established under the Agricultural Act of 1949; (iii) Any gain realized by a producer from repaying a loan for a crop ofwheat, feed grains, upland cotton, rice, or honey at the rate permittedunder section 107D(a)(5), 105C(a)(4), 103A(a)(5), 101A(a)(5), or 201(b)(2),respectively, of the Agricultural Act of 1949, or any gain realized bya producer from repaying a loan for a crop of any other commodity at alower level established than the original loan level under the AgriculturalAct of 1949; (iv) Any deficiency payment received for a crop of wheat or feed grainsunder section 107D(c)(1) or 105C(c)(1), respectively, or the AgriculturalAct of 1949 as the result of a reduction of the loan level for such cropunder section 107D(a)(4) or 105C(a)(3) of the Agricultural Act of 1949;(v) Any loan deficiency payment received for a crop of wheat, feed grains,upland cotton, or rice under section 107D(b), 105C(b), 103A(b), or 101A(g),respectively, of the Agricultural Act of 1949; (vi) Any inventory reduction payment received for a crop of wheat, feedgrains, upland cotton, or rice under section 107D(g), 105C(g), 103A(g),or 101A(g), respectively, of the Agricultural Act of 1949; and (vii) With respect to the Conservation Reserve Program, annual rental payments.<T3>Permitted Entity. </T3>A permitted entity is an entity designated annuallyby an individual which is to receive a payment, loan, or benefit undera program specified in andSection; 1497.1. <T3>Person. </T3>(1) A person is: (i) An individual, including any individual participating in a farmingoperation as a partner in a general partnership, a participant in a jointventure, or a participant in a similar entity; (ii) A corporation, joint stock company, association, limited partnership,irrevocable trust, revocable trust together with the grantor of the trust,estate, or charitable organization, including any such entity or organizationparticipating in the farming operation as a partner in a general partnership,a participant in a joint venture, a grantor of a revocable trust, or asa participant in a similar entity; and (iii) A State, political subdivision, or agency thereof. (2) In order for an individual or entity other than an individual or entitywho is a member of a joint operation to be considered a separate personfor the purposes of this part, in addition to other provisions of thispart, the individual or entity must: (i) Have a separate and distinct interest in the land or the crop involved;(ii) Exercise separate responsibility for such interest; and (iii) Maintain funds or accounts separate from that of any other individualor entity for such interest. (3) With respect to an individual or entity who is a member of a jointoperation, such individual or entity will have met the requirements ofparagraph (2) of this definition if the joint operation meets the requirementsof such paragraph. (4) Any cooperative association of producers that markets commodities forproducers with respect to the commodities so marketed for producers shallnot be considered to be a person. <T3>Public School. </T3>A public school is a primary, elementary, secondaryschool, college, or university which is directly administered under theauthority of a governmental body or which receives a predominant amountof its financing from public funds. <T3>Related entity. </T3>A related entity is an entity in which a memberof a farming operation, which consists of two or more entities, has aninterest, either directly or indirectly. <T3>Significant Contribution. </T3>A significant contribution is the provisionof the following to a farming operation by an individual or entity: (1)(i) With respect to land, capital, or equipment contributed by an individualor entity, a contribution which has a value which is equal to at least50 percent of the individual's or entity's commensurate share of: (A) The total value of the capital necessary to conduct the farming operation;(B) The total rental value of the land necessary to conduct the farmingoperation; (C) The total rental value of the equipment necessary to conduct the farmingoperation; or (ii) If the contribution by an individual or entity consists of any combinationof land, capital, and equipment, such combined contribution must have avalue which is equal to 30 percent of the individual's or entity's commensurateshare of the total value of the farming operation; (2) With respect to active personal labor, an amount which is the smallerof: (i) 1,000 hours per calendar year; or (ii) 50 percent of the total hours which would be required to conduct afarming operation which is comparable in size to such individual's or entity'scommensurate share in the farming operation; (3) With respect to active personal management, activities which are criticalto the profitability of the farming operation, taking into considerationthe individual's or entity's commensurate share in the farming operation;and (4) With respect to a combination of active personal labor and active personalmanagement, when neither contribution meets the requirements of paragraphs(2) and (3) of this definition, a combination of active personal laborand active personal management when viewed together which results in acritical impact on the profitability of the farming operation in an amountat least equal to either the significant contribution of active personallabor or active personal management as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3)of this definition.<T3>Substantial Beneficial Interest. </T3>A substantial beneficial interestin any entity is an interest of 10 percent or more. In determining whethersuch an interest equals at least 10 percent, all interests in the entitywhich are owned by an individual or entity directly or indirectly throughsuch means as ownership of a corporation which owns the entity shall betaken into consideration. In order to ensure that the provisions of thispart are not circumvented by an individual or entity, the Deputy Administratormay determine that an ownership interest requirement of less than 10 percentshall be applied to such individual or entity. <T3>Total Value of the Farming Operation. </T3>The total value of the farmingoperation is the total of the costs, excluding the value of active personallabor and active personal management which is contributed by a person whois a member of the farming operation, needed to carry out the farming operationfor the year for which the determination is made. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Timing for determining status of persons. </ITAG>(a) Except as otherwise set forth in this part, the status of an individualor entity on April 1 of the current year, or such other date as may bedetermined and announced by the Deputy Administrator, shall be the basison which determinations are made in accordance with this part for the yearin which the determination is made. (b) Actions taken by an individual or entity after April 1, or such otherdate as may be determined and announced by the Deputy Administrator, buton or before the final harvest date of the last program crop in the area,as determined by the Deputy Administrator, shall not be used to determinewhether there has been an increase in the number of persons for the currentyear. Actions taken by a person after April 1, or such other date as maybe determined and announced by the Deputy Administrator, but on or beforethe harvest of the last program crop in the area, shall be used to determinewhether there has been a decrease in the number of persons for the currentyear. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Limitation on the number of entities through which an individualor entity may receive a payment and required notification. </ITAG>(a) An individual shall receive a payment under a program specified inandSection; 1497.1 either directly or indirectly from no more than threepermitted entities. An individual which receives such a payment shall notifythe county committee in the county in which such individual maintains afarming operation whether or not the farming operation is to be considereda permitted entity. An individual shall only receive such payments as aresult of a farming operation conducted by: (1) The individual and by no more than two entities in which the individualholds a substantial beneficial interest; or (2) No more than three entities in which the individual holds a substantialbeneficial interest. (b) Each entity entering into a contract or agreement under a program specifiedin andSection; 1497.1 shall, by the date the contract or agreement is submittedto the county committee, notify in writing: (1) Each individual or other entity that acquires or holds an interestin such entity of the requirements and limitations provided in this part;and (2) The county committee of the name and social security number of eachindividual and the name and taxpayer identification number of each entitythat holds or acquires a substantial beneficial interest in such entity.(c)(1) An individual or entity that holds a substantial beneficial interestin more than the number of permitted entities specified in paragraph (a)of this section for which a contract or agreement has been submitted tothe county committee shall notify the county committee, in each countyin which they conduct a farming operation, in writing of those entitiesthat shall be considered as permitted entities by a date as determinedand announced by the Deputy Administrator following the date the contractor agreement was submitted to the county committee. (2) The remaining entities in which the individual or entity holds a substantialbeneficial interest shall be notified that such entity is subject to reductionsin the payments earned by the remaining entity. Such a reduction shallbe made in an amount that bears the same relationship to the full paymentthat the individual's interest in the entity bears to all interests inthe entity. The remaining entity's members shall have the opportunity toadjust among themselves their proportionate shares of the program benefitsin the designated entity or entities before such reductions are made. (d) If an individual or entity fails to make such a notification as specifiedin paragraph (c) of this section, all entities in which the individualor entity holds a substantial beneficial interest shall be subject to areduction in payments in the manner specified in paragraph (c)(2) of thissection. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> General provisions for determining whether an individual or entityis actively engaged in farming. </ITAG>(a) To be considered a person who is eligible to receive payments withrespect to a particular farming operation, a person must be an individualor entity actively engaged in farming with respect to such operation. (b) Actively engaged in farming means, except as otherwise provided inthis part, that the individual or entity, independently makes a significantcontribution to a farming operation, of: (1) Capital, equipment, or land, or a combination of capital, equipment,or land; and (2) Active personal labor or active personal management, or a combinationof active personal labor and active personal management. (c) In determining if the individual or entity is actively contributinga significant amount of active personal labor or active personal managementthe following factors shall be taken into consideration: (1) The types of crops produced by the farming operation; (2) The normal and customary farming practices of the area; and (3) The total amount of labor and management which is necessary for sucha farming operation in the area. (d) In order to be considered to be actively engaged in farming an individualor entity specified in andSection; 1497.7 through andSection; 1497.15 musthave: (1) A share of the profits or losses from the farming operation which iscommensurate with the individual's or entity's contribution to the operation;and (2) Contributions to the farming operation which are at risk. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Individuals. </ITAG>(a) An individual shall be considered to be actively engaged in farmingwith respect to a farming operation if the individual makes a significantcontribution of: (1) Capital, equipment, or land, or a combination of capital, equipment,or land; and (2) Active personal labor or active personal management, or a combinationof active personal labor and active personal management. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.497.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Joint operations. </ITAG>(a) Members of a joint operation must furnish satisfactory evidence thattheir contributions of land, labor, management, equipment, or capital tothe joint operation are commensurate with their claimed shares of the profitsor losses of the joint operation. (b) A member shall be considered to be actively engaged in farming withrespect to a farming operation if the member makes a significant contributionof: (1) Capital, equipment, or land or a combination of capital, equipment,or land; and (2) Active personal labor or active personal management or a combinationof active personal labor and active personal management. (c) If a joint operation separately makes a significant contribution ofcapital, equipment, or land, or a combination of capital, equipment, orland, and the joint operation meets the provisions of andSection; 1497.6(d),the members of the joint operation who make a significant contributionof active personal labor, active personal management, or a combinationof active personal labor and active personal management to the farmingoperation shall be considered to be actively engaged in farming with respectto such farming operation. (d) Each individual who shares in the profits or losses of such farmingoperation shall be considered to be a separate person only if the individualis actively engaged in the farming operation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Limited partnerships, corporations and other similar entities. </ITAG>(a) A limited partnership, corporation, or other similar entity shall beconsidered to be actively engaged in farming with respect to a farmingoperation if: (1) The entity separately makes a significant contribution to the farmingoperation of capital, equipment, or land, or a combination of capital,equipment, or land; and (2) The partners, stockholders, or members collectively make a significantcontribution, whether compensated or not compensated, of active personallabor, active personal management, or a combination of active personallabor and active personal management to the farming operation. The combinedbeneficial interest of all the partners, stockholders, or members providingactive personal labor or active personal management, or a combination ofactive personal labor or active personal management must be at least 50percent. (b) A limited partnership, corporation, or other similar entity shall beconsidered to be a person separate from an individual partner, stockholder,or member except that a limited partnership, corporation, or other similarentity in which more than 50 percent of the interest in such limited partnership,corporation, or other similar entity is owned by an individual (includingthe interest owned by the individual's spouse, minor children, and trustsfor the benefit of such minor children) or by an entity shall not be consideredas a separate person from such individual or entity. (c) If the same two or more individuals or entities own more than 50 percentof the interest in each of two or more limited partnerships, corporations,or other similar entities engaged in farming, all such limited partnerships,corporations, or other similar entities shall be considered to be one person.(d) The percentage share of the interest in a limited partnership, corporation,or other similar entity which is owned by an individual or other entityshall be determined as of April 1, or such other date as may be determinedand announced by the Deputy Administrator. If a partner, stockholder, ormember acquires an interest in the limited partnership, corporation, orother similar entity after such date, and on or before the harvest of thelast program crop in the area as determined by the Deputy Administrator,the amount of any such interest shall be included in determining the totalownership interest of such partner, stockholder, or member. (e) Where there is only one class of stock or other similar unit of ownership,an individual's or entity's percentage share of the limited partnership,corporation, or other similar entity shall be based upon the outstandingshares of stock or other similar unit of ownership held by the individualor entity and compared to the total outstanding shares of stock or othersimilar unit of ownership. If the limited partnership, corporation, orother similar entity has more than one class of stock or other unit ofownership, the percentage share of the limited partnership, corporation,or other similar entity owned by an individual or entity shall be determinedby the Deputy Administrator on the basis of market quotations. If marketquotations are lacking or are too scarce to be recognized, such percentageshare shall be determined by the Deputy Administrator on the basis of allrelevant factors affecting the fair market value of such stock or otherunit of ownership, including the various rights and privileges which areattributed to each such class. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Irrevocable trusts. </ITAG>(a) An irrevocable trust shall be considered to be actively engaged infarming with respect to a farming operation if: (1) The entity separately makes a significant contribution to the farmingoperation of capital, equipment, or land, or a combination of capital,equipment, or land; and (2) The income beneficiaries collectively make a significant contributionof active personal labor or active personal management, or a combinationof active personal labor and active personal management to the farmingoperation. (b) An irrevocable trust shall be considered to be a person separate fromthe individual income beneficiaries of the trust except that an irrevocabletrust which has a sole income beneficiary shall not be considered to bea separate person from such income beneficiary. (c) Where two or more irrevocable trusts have common income beneficiaries(including a spouse and minor children) with more than a 50 percent interest,all such trusts shall be considered to be one person. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revocable trusts. </ITAG>(a) A revocable trust shall be considered to be actively engaged in farmingwith respect to a farming operation if: (1) The entity separately makes a significant contribution to the farmingoperation of capital, equipment, or land, or a combination of capital,equipment, or land; and (2) The beneficiaries collectively make a significant contribution of activepersonal labor, active personal management, or a combination of activepersonal labor and active personal management to the operation. (b) A grantor and the revocable trust shall be considered to be one person.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Estates. </ITAG>(a) For two program years after the program year in which an individualdies the individual's estate shall be considered to be actively engagedin farming if: (1) The estate makes a significant contribution of either: (i) Capital, equipment, or land; or (ii) A combination of capital, equipment, or land; and (2) The personal representative or heirs of the estate collectively makea significant contribution of either: (i) Active personal labor or active personal management; or (ii) A combination of active personal labor and active personal management.(b) If the deceased individual would have been considered to be one personwith respect to an heir, the estate shall also be considered to be oneperson with such heir. (c) After the period set forth in paragraph (a) of this section, the deceasedindividual's estate shall not be considered to be actively engaged in farmingunless, on a case by case basis, the Deputy Administrator determines thatthe estate has not been settled primarily for the purpose of obtainingprogram payments. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Landowners. </ITAG>A person who is a landowner, including landowners with an undivided interestin land, contributing owned land to the farming operation shall be consideredto be actively engaged in farming if the landowner receives rent or incomefor such use of the land based on the land's production or the operation'soperating results. A landowner also includes a member of a joint operationwhen the joint operation holds title to land in the name of the joint operationif the joint operation or its members submit adequate documentation todetermine that, upon dissolution of the joint operation, the title to theland owned by the joint operation will revert to such a member of suchjoint operation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Family members. </ITAG>With respect to a farming operation conducted by persons, a majority ofwhom are individuals who are family members, an adult family member whomakes a significant contribution of active personal management, activepersonal labor, or a combination of active personal labor and active personalmanagement shall be considered to be actively engaged in farming. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sharecroppers. </ITAG>A sharecropper who makes a significant contribution of active personallabor to the farming operation shall be considered to be actively engagedin farming. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cash rent tenants. </ITAG>Any tenant that conducts a farming operation in which the tenant rentsthe land for cash or a crop share guaranteed as to the amount of the commodityshall be considered to be the same person as the landlord unless the tenantmakes a significant contribution to the farming operation of: (a) Active personal labor and capital, land or equipment; or (b) Active personal management and equipment. If such equipment is leasedby the tenant from: (1) The landlord, the lease must reflect the fair market value of the equipmentleased. (2) The same individual or entity that is providing hired labor to thefarming operation, the contracts for the lease of the equipment and forthe hired labor must be two separate contracts which reflect the fair marketvalue of the leased equipment and the hired labor and the tenant must exercisecomplete control over the use of a significant amount of the equipmentduring the current crop year.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Persons not considered to be actively engaged in farming. </ITAG>An individual or entity who does not meet any of the provisions of andSection;1497.7 through 1497.15 and a landowner who rents land to a farming operationfor cash or a crop share guaranteed as to the amount of the commodity shallnot be considered to be actively engaged in farming. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Changes in farming operations. </ITAG>(a) Any change in a farming operation that would increase the number ofpersons must be bona fide and substantive. The addition of a family memberto a farming operation in accordance with andSection; 1497.14 shall be consideredto be such a change, except that such an addition will not affect the statusof any other individual or entity which is added to the farming operation.A change in a farming operation in a previous year that was not consideredto be bona fide and substantive shall not increase the number of personsin a subsequent year. If bona fide, the following shall be considered tobe substantive changes in the farming operation: (1) With respect to a landowner only, a change from a cash rent to a sharerent; (2) An increase through the acquisition of land not previously involvedin the farming operation of approximately 20 percent or more in the totalcropland involved in the farming operation if such cropland has crop acreagebases which are at least normal for the area; (3) A change in ownership by sale or gift of a significant amount of equipmentfrom an individual or entity who previously has been engaged in a farmingoperation to an individual or entity who has not been invoived in suchoperation. The sale or gift of equipment will be considered to be bonafide and substantive only if the transferred amount of such equipment iscommensurate with the new individual's or entity's share of the farmingoperation; or (4) A change in ownership by sale or gift of a significant amount of landfrom an individual or entity who previously has been engaged in a farmingoperation to an individual or entity who has not been involved in suchoperation. The sale or gift of land will be considered to be bona fideand substantive only if the transferred amount of such land is commensuratewith the new individual's or entity's share of the farming operation. (5) The Deputy Administrator may determine other bona fide changes to besubstantive. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Husband and wife. </ITAG>With respect to any married couple, the husband and wife shall be consideredto be one person except that a husband and wife, who prior to their marriagewere separately engaged in unrelated farming operations, will be determinedto be separate persons with respect to such farming operations so longas such operations remains separate and distinct from any farming operationconducted by the other spouse. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Minor children. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, a minor, includinga minor who is the beneficiary of a trust or who is an heir of an estate,and the parent or any court-appointed person such as a guardian or conservatorwho is responsible for the minor shall be considered to be one person.(b) A minor may be considered to be a separate person from the minor'sparent or any court appointed person such as a guardian or conservatorwho is responsible for the minor if the minor is a producer on a farm andthe minor's parent or any court appointed person such as a guardian orconservator who is responsible for the minor does not have any interestin the farm on which the minor is a producer or in any production fromsuch farm. In addition it must be determined that the minor: (1) Has established and maintains a separate household from the minor'sparents or any court-appointed person such as a guardian or conservatorwho is responsible for the minor and such minor personally carries outthe farming activities with respect to the minor's farming operation forwhich there is a separate accounting; or (2) Does not live in the same household as such minor's parent and: (i) Is represented by a court-appointed guardian or conservator who isresponsible for the minor; and (ii) Ownership of the farm is vested in the minor. (c) A person shall be considered to be a minor until the age 18 is reached.Court proceedings conferring majority on a person under 18 years of agewill not change such person's status as a minor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Charitable organizations. </ITAG>Charitable organizations, including a club, society, fraternal or religiousorganization, shall be considered to be a separate person to the extentthat such an entity is engaged in the production of crops as a separateperson, except where the land or the proceeds from the farming operationmay revert to an entity which exercises control or authority over suchorganization. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Indian tribal ventures. </ITAG>Payments may be made in excess of an applicable payment limitation provisionwith respect to land which is owned or held in trust for an Indian tribalcouncil and not rented or otherwise acquired by an Indian tribal ventureif a responsible official of the Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) or theIndian tribal council certifies that no payment in excess of such limitationwill accrue directly or indirectly to any individual Indian, includingthe individual's spouse and minor children. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> States, political subdivisions, and agencies thereof. </ITAG>A State, political subdivision and agencies thereof shall be consideredto be one person. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Scheme or device. </ITAG>(a) All or any part of the payment otherwise due a person on all farmsin which the person has an interest may be withheld or be required to berefunded if the person adopts or participates in adopting a scheme or devicewhich is designed to evade this part or which has the effect of evadingthis part. Such acts shall include, but are not limited to: (1) Concealing information which affects the application of this part;(2) Submitting false or erroneous information; or (3) Creating fictitious entities for the purpose of concealing the interestof a person in a farming operation. (b) If the Deputy Administrator determines that any person has adopteda scheme or device to evade, or that has the purpose of evading, the provisionsof section 1001, 1001A, or 1001C of the Food Security Act of 1985 suchperson shall be ineligible to receive payments under the programs specifiedin andSection; 1497.1(a)(1)-(3) with respect to the year for which such schemeor device was adopted and the succeeding year. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Joint and several liability. </ITAG>If two or more individuals or entities are considered to be one personand the total payment received is in excess of the applicable payment limitationprovision, such individuals or entities shall be jointly and severallyliable for any liability which arises therefrom. The provisions of thissection shall be applicable in addition to any liability which arises undera criminal or civil statute. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Equitable adjustments. </ITAG>(a) Actions taken by an individual or an entity in good faith on actionor advice of an authorized representative of the Deputy Administrator maybe accepted as meeting the requirements of this part to the extent theDeputy Administrator deems necessary in order to provide fair and equitabletreatment to such individual or entity. (b) In cases in which the application of this part will reduce paymentsto a farming operation, the Deputy Administrator may waive the applicationof the provisions of andSection; 1497.18 with respect to any reorganizationapplied for prior to April 1, 1989, or such other date as may be determinedand announced by the Deputy Administrator, to the extent the Deputy Administratordetermines appropriate to facilitate equitable reorganizations that donot result in an increase in payments. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Appeals. </ITAG>(a) Any person may obtain reconsideration and review of determinationsmade under this part in accordance with the appeal regulations set forthat Part 780 of this title. With respect to such appeals, the applicablereviewing authority shall: (1) Schedule a hearing with respect to the appeal within 45 days followingreceipt of the written appeal; and (2) Issue a determination within 60 days following the hearing. (b) The time limitations provided in paragraph (a) of this section shallnot apply if: (1) The appellant, or the appellant's representative, requests a postponementof the scheduled hearing;(2) The appellant, or the appellant's representative, requests additionaltime following the hearing to present additional information or a writtenclosing statement; (3) The appellant has not timely presented information to the reviewingauthority; or (4) An investigation by the Office of Inspector General is ongoing or acourt proceeding is involved which affects the amount of payments a personmay receive. (c) If the deadlines provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sectionare not met, the relief sought by the producer's appeal will be grantedfor the applicable crop year unless the Deputy Administrator determinesthat the producer did not follow the farm operating plan which was presentedinitially to the county committee for the year which is the subject ofthe appeal. (d) An appellant may waive the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) ofthis section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1497.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Paperwork Reduction Act assigned number. </ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in this part have beenapproved by the Office of Management and Budget under the provisions of44 U.S.C. Chapter 35 and have been assigned OMB control number 0560-0096.6. A new Part 1498 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1498_FOREIGN PERSONS INELIGIBLE FOR PROGRAM BENEFITS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.1 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.2 Administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.3 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.4 Ineligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.5 Notification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.6 Scheme or device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.7 Equitable relief. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.8 Appeals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1498.9 Paperwork Reduction Act assigned number.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Section 1001C of the Food Security Act of 1985, asamended, 99 Stat. 1444, as amended (7 U.S.C. 1308, et seq.). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>This part is applicable to any type of payment, loan, and benefit madewith respect to 1989 and 1990 crops. This part is not applicable to anypayment, loan, and benefit which is made with respect to the productionof a commodity planted, or commodity program or Conservation Reserve Programcontract approved, before December 22, 1987. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administration. </ITAG>(a) The regulations in this part will be administered under the generalsupervision and direction of the Executive Vice President, CCC, and theAdministrator, ASCS. In the field, the regulations in this part will beadministered by the Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation State andcounty committees (herein referred to as ``State and county committees'',respectively). State and county executive directors and State and countycommittees do not have authority to modify or waive any of the provisionsof this part. (b) The State committee may take any action authorized or required by thispart to be taken by the county committee which has not been taken by suchcommittee. The State committee may also: (1) Correct or require a county committee to correct any action taken bysuch county committee which is not in accordance with this part; or (2) Require a county committee to withhold taking any action which is notin accordance with this part. (c) No delegation herein to a State or county committee shall precludethe Executive Vice President, CCC, and the Administrator, ASCS, or a designee,from determining any question arising under this part or from reversingor modifying any determination made by a State or county committee. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>(a) The terms defined in Part 719 of this chapter shall be applicable tothis part and all documents issued in accordance with this part, exceptas otherwise provided in this section. (b) The following definitions shall be applicable to this part: <T3>Active Personal Labor. </T3>Active personal labor is personally providingphysical activities necessary in a farming operation, including activitiesinvolved in land preparation, planting, cultivating, harvesting, and marketingof agricultural commodities in the farming operation. Other physical activitiesinclude those physical activities required to establish and maintain conservingcover crops or conserving use acreages and those physical activities necessaryin livestock operations. <T3>Alien. </T3>Any person not a citizen or national of the United States.<T3>Capital. </T3>Capital consists of the funding provided by an individualor entity to the farming operation in order for such operation to conductfarming activities. In determining whether an individual or entity hascontributed capital to the farming operation, such capital must have beenderived from a fund or account separate and distinct from that of any otherindividual or entity involved in such operation. Capital does not includethe value of any labor or management which is contributed to the farmingoperation. A capital contribution may be a direct out-of-pocket input ofa specified sum or an amount borrowed by the individual or entity. Withrespect to a farming operation which consists of more than one individualor entity: (1) Such capital which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(b) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andmust not be acquired as a result of a loan made to: (i) The farming operation in which the individual or entity has an interest;(ii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation by the farming operationor any of its members, beneficiaries or related entities; or (iii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation, which was guaranteedor secured by the farming operation or any of its members, beneficiariesor related entities. (2) Such capital which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(d) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andif acquired as a result of a loan made to the individuals or entities providedin items (1)(i) through (1)(iii) of this definition the loan must be aloan bearing the prevailing interest rate. <T3>Entity. </T3>An entity is a corporation, joint stock company, association,limited partnership, irrevocable trust, revocable trust, estate, charitableorganization, or other similar organization including any such organizationparticipating in the farming operation as a partner in a general partnership,a participant in a joint venture, a grantor of a revocable trust, or asa participant in a similar organization. <T3>Land. </T3>Land is farmland consisting of cropland, pastureland, wetland,or rangeland which meets the specific requirements of the applicable program.With respect to a farming operation which consists of more than one individualor entity: (1) Such land which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(b) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andmust not have been acquired as a result of a loan made to: (i) The farming operation in which the individual or entity has an interest;(ii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation by the farming operationor any of its members, beneficiaries, or related entities; or (iii) Such individual, entity, or farming operation, which was guaranteedor secured by the farming operation or any of its members, beneficiaries,or related entities. (2) Such land which is contributed to meet the requirements of andSection;1497.6(d) must be contributed directly by the individual or entity andif acquired as a result of a loan made to the individuals or entities providedin items (1)(i) through (1)(iii) of this definition the loan must be aloan bearing the prevailing interest rate. (3) Such land may be leased from any source. If such land is leased fromanother individual or entity with an interest in the farming operation,the land must be leased at a fair market value.<T3>Lawful Alien. </T3>Any person that is not a citizen or national ofthe United States but who is admitted into the United States for permanentresidence under the Immigration and Nationality Act and possesses a validAlien Registration Receipt Card (Form I-551 or I-151). <T3>Payment, Loan, and Benefit. </T3>A payment, loan, or benefit made inaccordance with the Agricultural Act of 1949, the Commodity Credit CorporationCharter Act, or Subtitle D of Title XIII of the Food Security Act of 1985,which results in a direct expenditure by the Commodity Credit Corporationor any other agency of the Federal government, including a payment madein accordance with Part 1470 of this title. Such term does not includethe establishment of crop acreage bases, farm program payment yields, acreageallotments, marketing quotas, and similar program provisions. <T3>Person. </T3>(1) A person is: (i) An individual, including any individual participating in a farmingoperation as a partner in a general partnership, a participant in a jointventure, or a participant in a similar entity; (ii) A corporation, joint stock company, association, limited partnership,irrevocable trust, revocable trust together with the grantor of the trust,estate, or charitable organization, including any such entity or organizationparticipating in the farming operation as a partner in a general partnership,a participant in a joint venture, a grantor of a revocable trust, or asa participant in a similar entity; and (iii) A State, political subdivision, or agency thereof. (2) In order for an individual or entity other than an individual or entitywho is a member of a joint operation to be considered a separate personfor the purposes of this part, in addition to other provisions of thispart, the individual or entity must: (i) Have a separate and distinct interest in the land or the crop involved;(ii) Exercise separate responsibility for such interest; and (iii) Maintain funds or accounts separate from that of any other individualor entity for such interest. (3) With respect to an individual or entity who is a member of a jointoperation, such individual or entity will have met the requirements ofparagraph (2) of this definition if the joint operation meets the requirementsof such paragraph. (4) Any cooperative association of producers that markets commodities forproducers with respect to the commodities so marketed for producers shallnot be considered to be a person. <T3>Substantial amount of active personal labor. </T3>Substantial amountof active personal labor means the provision of active personal labor inan amount which is the smaller of: (1) 1,000 hours per calendar year; or (2) 50 percent of the total hours which would be required to conduct afarming operation which is comparable in size to such individual's or entity'scommensurate share in the farming operation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Ineligibility. </ITAG>(a) Any person who is not a citizen of the United States or a lawful alienshall be ineligible to receive payments, loans and benefits, with respectto any commodity produced, or land set aside from production, on a farmthat is owned or operated by such person unless such person is an individualwho is providing land, capital, and a substantial amount of active personallabor on such farm. (b)(1) A corporation or other entity shall be ineligible to receive payments,loans, and benefits if more than 10 percent of the beneficial ownershipof the entity is held by persons who are not citizens of the United Statesor lawful aliens unless such persons provide a substantia1 amount of activepersonal labor in the production of crops on a farm owned by such an entity.However, upon the written request of the entity, the Deputy Administratormay make payments in an amount determined by the Deputy Administrator tobe representative of the percentage interest of the entity which is ownedby citizens of the United States and lawful aliens. (2) In determining whether more than 10 percent of the beneficial ownershipof an entity is held by such persons, the beneficial ownership interestshall be the higher of the amount of such interest on: (i) The date the applicable program contract or agreement is executed bythe entity; or (ii) Any other date prior to the final harvest date which is determinedand announced by the Deputy Administrator to be normal in the area forthe applicable program crop. (3) A corporation or other entity shall inform the county committee ofany increase in such ownership which occurs after the applicable programcontract or agreement is executed. (4) In the event of an increase in such ownership after a payment, loan,and benefit has been made, the entity shall refund such payment, loan,and benefit. (5) Where there is only one class of stock or other similar unit of ownership,an individual's or entity's percentage share of the limited partnership,corporation or other similar entity shall be based upon the outstandingshares of stock or other similar unit of ownership held by the individualor entity and compared to the total outstanding shares of stock or othersimilar unit of ownership. If the limited partnership, corporation or othersimilar entity has more than one class of stock or other unit of ownership,the percentage share of the limited partnership, corporation or other similarentity owned by an individual or entity shall be determined by the DeputyAdministrator on the basis of market quotations. If market quotations arelacking or are too scarce to be recognized, such percentage share shallbe determined by the Deputy Administrator on the basis of all relevantfactors affecting the fair market value of such stock or other unit ofownership, including the various rights and privileges which are attributedto each such class. (c) A citizen of the United States, lawful alien, and entity which is notsubject to this part who is in lawful possession, through a lease or otherwise,of a farm owned by an individual or entity who is subject to this partor who is successor-in-interest to a program contract or agreement withrespect to such a farm may receive a payment, loan, and benefit withoutregard to this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Notification. </ITAG>(a) Any entity, whether foreign or domestic, who executes a program contractor agreement under which a payment, loan, and benefit may be availablemust provide written notification to the county committee in the countywhere the entity conducts its farming operation if: (1) Any individual, group of individuals, entity, or group of entitiesholds more than a 10 percent beneficial interest in such entity; and (2) Such individual, group of individuals, entity, or group of entities,in accordance with andSection; 1498.4, are ineligible to receive a payment,loan and benefit. (b) Such written notification should include the name and social securitynumber or taxpayer identification number of such individual or entity andof all individuals and entities that hold a beneficial interest. (c) The failure of the entity to provide this information will result inthe ineligibility of the entity to receive any payment, loan, and benefit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Scheme or device. </ITAG>(a) All or any part of the payment otherwise due a person on all farmsin which the person has an interest may be withheld or be required to berefunded if the person adopts or participates in adopting a scheme or devicewhich is designed to evade this part or which has the effect of evadingthis part. Such acts shall include, but are not limited to: (1) Concealing information which affects the application of this part;(2) Submitting false or erroneous information; or (3) Creating any fictitious entity for the purpose of concealing the interestof a person in a farming operation. (b) If the Deputy Administrator determines that any person has adopteda scheme or device to evade, or that has the purpose of evading, the provisionsof section 1001, 1001A, or 1001C, of the Food Security Act of 1985, suchperson shall be ineligible to receive payments under the programs specifiedin andSection; 1498.1 with respect to the year for which such scheme or devicewas adopted and the succeeding year. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Equitable relief. </ITAG>Actions taken by an individual or an entity in good faith on action oradvice of an authorized representative of the Deputy Administrator maybe accepted as meeting the requirements of this part to the extent theDeputy Administrator deems necessary in order to provide fair and equitabletreatment to such individual or entity. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Appeals. </ITAG>Any person may obtain reconsideration and review of determinations madeunder this part in accordance with the appeal regulations set forth asPart 780 of this title. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1498.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Paperwork Reduction Act assigned number. </ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in this part have beenapproved by the Office of Management and Budget under the provisions of44 U.S.C. Chapter 35 and have been assigned OMB control number 0560-0096.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, on July 29, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Milton Hertz, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Executive Vice President, Commodity Credit Corporation and Administrator,Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-17468 Filed 8-1-88; 5:05 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-05-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>